Cardinal George Pell was given column inches in The Australian to defend “man of immense compassion and goodness”, Pope Benedict XVI, yesterday. It’s sickening stuff, watching Pell bend over backwards, forwards and every which way to defend the hierarchy in the Catholic Church from its complicity in covering up the crimes committed by pedophiles. (Sometimes I wonder why the church doesn’t just rename itself the Pedophile Protection Society. That seems to be its main function these days.)
8:30. I woke up for good, assisted by the glorious scent of percolating coffee. I love my roommate. (And not just because when I got home at 1:30 in the morning last night there was a birthday card waiting for me on the breakfast table.) He makes me coffee (when I don't beat him to it), listens to my blog posts before they are published, and gives me man advice. He is, in a word, fantastic. After I divulged the events of last night with Chuck, I sat down to drink the lovely percolated coffee and write my post. It was a great way to process the night.
If you're like me, you want the best of both worlds. I believe that this last method can be the best of both the chronological way of thinking as well as the categoric way of thinking. Bringing your right brain together with your left brain can not only make for better archiving, but also ease in searching down the road. Here's how it looks.
I think my home emailer failed me and so the update earlier today did
Rest assured though, for Rupert this is water off a duck who has been swimming around in an oil slick’s back, and will be nothing more than a minor delay. He is probably boiling the kettle as we speak and telling James, in the words of Bernard-Paul Heroux, ’there is no trouble so great or grave that cannot be much diminished by a nice cup of tea.’
Me, "Yes, and Jesus loves you more than you can imagine!"
I can't blame him, that's usually what I think at birthday parties, too.
Our family is small (three of us that eat big-people food), so I pretty much halved everything in the recipe below. The original makes 8-10 side dish servings. I also substituted chopped up mini cucumbers for avocados since my hubs doesn't like avocados. Like I said, it was really easy to throw together (especially if you just cook the bacon in the microwave), and tasted just like I expect summer foods to taste. Sweet. Tangy. Crisp. Light. Perfect. :)
Lest freedom should wave between the grasses
It’s a shame to end with out a number 10 but I really do think that is enough for now. So I’ll just leave you with this thought – how great our drawings would we be if we just spent a little and often on them! I’m trying, I really am! I would love to hear what inspires you to draw and even see some…send me a link. JP
The Board of Alcohol Concern has announced a restructuring of its senior management following the loss of core funding, with the role of the CEO becoming part time for a year alongside the recruitment of a full time Director of Fundraising and Campaigning.
Girl: "OK Mom."
Manhattan Towers
Giving to the needy, praying, and fasting are all desirable behaviors and they can each draw us closer to God. But Jesus says we should do them all in secret so that only He knows what we have done. If we parade our good deeds in front of men in order to gain their praise then the praise we receive will be our only reward. But if we do these things in secret so that only God knows, then we will be rewarded by our Heavenly Father.
The first two bars we checked out I stuck with the easy stuff - two 16oz daiquiris. At the third bar I got a beer. At the fourth bar I got another beer. I was pretty good at this point. It's then that dad says:
How about romance? Put on your waltzing shoes as Coco stands out in her little black dress, glowing in the arms of Arthur, who is one of the most dashing romantic characters I’ve ever seen as they twirl around the dance floor of the casino.
This book has been taught in schools and I can see why. It's a wonderful example of what can be done with language - words stay simple while phrase and simile soar with beauty. Writing from the POV of a character with synaesthesia gives the author unlimited scope for describing things in wholly new ways, and Nicola has done just that. The imagery melts on your tongue like the colour of birdsong.
Connie Boswell continued to have a successful solo career as a singer for Decca. She later changed the spelling of her name from Connie to Connee in the 1940′s, reputedly because it made it easier to sign autographs. (It’s interesting to note that Connee sang from a wheelchair – or seated position – during her entire career, due to an accident she suffered as a young child. Amazingly, when she tried to get involved with the overseas U.S.O tours. during World War II, she was not given permission to travel overseas due to her disability.)
I had a really weird dream last night. In my dream, I had gone back to bartending at a nightclub I used to work at. When I got to my well, I looked around and noticed that there wasn't much alcohol in my well. In fact, 3/4 of my storage area was stocked with frozen food like Hot Pockets, frozen buffalo wings, fajitas and basically anything frozen you could throw into a microwave and eat. I was obviously confused.
Perry, who Forbes ranked entertainment’s highest paid man last year when he received an estimated $130 million in pay, released a statement through a publicist:
Not only is it just appropriate for today – it’s pretty damn appropriate for me in general.
crab walk
Five months before Earth Day, on Sunday, November 30, 1969, The New York Times carried a lengthy article by Gladwin Hill reporting on the astonishing proliferation of environmental events:
Be encouraged today with the availability, compassion and commitment from Jesus. Only He can fulfill your life with joy, peace and hope. Ask Jesus into your life today and experience the greatest success your life will ever know. In the next blogs, I will share areas where I have been successful (as well as failures) and show how to overcome the obstacles that hinder us from a most successful life we will ever have.
And wear it as a favour; and with that
Leon Day - OISE All-Stars
The research team included UI researchers from the UI Carver College of Medicine and UCSF.
Right in the middle of yet another love-making session, he was banging her like a screen door in a hurricane. Kevin and Tammy heard the creaking of the porch floor, and they knew someone was coming in the door. They both jumped from the bed. Tammy threw her robe on in a split second. And Kevin grabbed his uniform, his gun belt and his pride and headed for the bedroom window. Just as Kevin was halfway out the window a terrified voice shouted “Don’t!” Tammy screamed at the top of her lungs as she laid eyes on Bobby Joe standing there with his pistol pointed at Kevin. Bobby looked at Tammy with disgust, sadness and disbelief as he aimed his gun. Kevin, being an over-sexed coward at that moment, was trying to escape when a gunshot rang out. Kevin fell out of the bedroom window and hit the ground face first.
What I’ve liked:
Jail records did not show whether Wilson had an attorney.
Nits Sketches of Spain NL
The man and I had fun this earth hour.
With rivers like our own that seek for seas
Which brings me to Tan Ya. She doesn’t really let anything get to her until now. I like that Mi Roo isn’t enveloped within her own stuff to notice what’s going on with Tan Ya. Letting those emotions fester for so long isn’t really healthy and Mi Roo’s worried that she’ll explode from holding back for so long. What makes Tan Ya so likable is that she’s extremely loyal to her friends even though she’s got abandonment issues. So now she’s got a choice to make. Is it better for her to go with Young Ho and live a carefree life or does she choose Gwan Woo and take a chance with love? That’s not something she can deal with until she deals with the matter about her mother. Parents are vital in showing their children what love is and it’s no surprise to see Tan Ya is very confused about it. Personally, I’m already feeling the drama’s urgency to wrap things up but there are so many things that are still hanging in the balance. I don’t know how that can be done well in just the remaining 2 episodes. I wish Tan Ya’s mommy issues were addressed earlier.
using some of the leaves, line the bottom of a pan. this is to prevent burning or sticking. don't skip it. make sure your pan has a well fitting lid. on top of these leaves, carefully place — seam-side down — all of the dolma. you will probably make 2 or 3 layers. put more of the left over leaves on top if you have any. measure out 1/2 c of water and add the juice of 1/2 a lemon and 2 tbsp olive oil. pour and place a ceramic plate over them to keep them in place as they cook.
Because I hate to see people suffer and want them to feel better, I had almost undermined the convicting work of the Holy Spirit in Isaiah’s mother. God sees the source of the pain under the scar tissue of our spirit and soul, and He knows that sometimes the only way to bring healing and restoration is to scrape off the dead, outer layer of skin that is holding the infection captive, cleanse the wound, and pour in the healing oil of His Spirit. That’s a painful process! And we need to let it happen in our own lives as well as in other’s.
(Splash)
Tony's three criteria for successful relationships in which one partner has Aspergers Syndrome. Have a think about it.... does your relationship satisfy all three criteria? If not, is there anything you can do about it?
In the side characters we’re given two men that are mirror images of one another: a bad man with a good father, Alberto Vist; and Riddhe Marcenas, a good young man with a morally compromised father. Alberto Vist becomes visibly more uncomfortable with the repercussions of his and his colleagues’ actions as the show goes on. It’s subtle, but at several points you can almost hear him thinking: “I was raised better than this.” And then Riddhe Marcenas, that moral and ethical failure on his father’s part steadily colors the son’s actions as the series goes on. From the simple entitlement he displays by stealing the Delta Plus and trying to make himself seem important, to murder on the battlefield to avoid being seen as “naive”.
Wind blew and gusted and caressed and puffed
I did get the carpet shampooing done on two floors while cleaning up for the TLS event tonight. There I fail again. Didn’t get enough phone calls made to have a good turnout tonight. So this will be another failed attempt at getting a good foundation going on my TLS coaching certification. I don’t think my accountability partner is even going to show up.
His story is one that has become the stuff of 21st-century digital lore. Crazy old guy posts videos of himself online, professes undying love for adorkable Japanese technopop group, audiences are simultaneously weirded out and fascinated, and an Internette Legend is born.
Qualified candidates are regularly overlooked, and for the simplest of reasons: they didn’t plug the right combo of buzzwords into their resumes. Candidates are taking things into their own hands. In an attempt to circumvent the keyword-laden resume game, job seekers are adopting a more creative approach to captivating recruiters. Rather than dropping the resume altogether, the trend seems to be more focused on breaking away from over-automation and a return to the heart of what makes a good hire.
The good news is that we have been found and may soon be rescued. But the bad news is some of us must wait much longer to be saved. Those of us who are left behind much watch the helicopter take off again, without us.
Sunday I did some more strength training but swapped out the "T" push-ups and stability ball stuff for planks, both front and side, and some bench presses. I was also going to try the Tabata intervals on the treadmill (downloaded a timer app and everything!) but Jason had rearranged the electricals in the basement and the treadmill was no longer plugged in and I didn't feel like futzing with it. But he used the treadmill this morning so I'll definitely be trying them one day this week!
Anyway, maybe somebody can help me with my ignorance. Until then, my advice is to run like you're supposed to and stay at least 30 feet away from donuts.
Julie and Melissa
What do the following jobs all have in common: content strategist, cloud architect, and app development manager? They are all new positions which didn’t exist before the advent of the digital age! The tech revolution has ushered in a plethora of previously unimaginable job titles to reflect the new job functions demanded by the new information era.
Circle Time:
Of course, most of us only think about our luggage when we’re actually using it. But there’s more to good suitcase ownership than hitting the road, and remembering what to pack. I found this short list of luggage care tips. Feel free to add your own in the comments. And do tell me about your experiences with the newer hard-shell luggage!
Red Cliff
Originally known as Hôtel de la Perle, this “immeuble de rapport” (residential rental property) was completed during the reign of Emperor Napoleon III in 1855 by the entrepreneur Antoine-Théodore Audubert (1819-1893).
13 Wearing new jammies. If I was rich I'd throw my jammies away every morning and wear a fresh pair every night. Actually I could afford to do that if I always got the fiver ones from Peacocks.
Games might seem a trivial way of approaching the public with new ideas, but the playful and exploratory impulses that draw gamers to great games are still largely untapped as a means of engagement. By pushing boundaries ourselves, we hope to show others what can be achieved.
Well, that and plenty of good food, some wine, fresh sheets . . .
mgold@bigelowaerospace.com
keep in mind, i love doing stuff like this, and my prices are very reasonable! i spruced up this table for around $60. :) email me at kristen.fountain@gmail.com
Meantime I invited Madstone to contribute here as a guest author in my occasional series – the Youngblood Guest Blog – and I think you will be as delighted as I am by what you read.
A coffee cup that I folded from the paper
Gloria, only 11 years older than I, was a pistol. A big-chested, hilarious woman who delighted in nothing more than organizing other people's lives; she worked in a local tourism office and travel agency in the Costa Brava. I was randomly paired with her and her husband Joan through Youth For Understanding in 1994 and lived with them that summer as an exchange student in high school. Ours was the brochure exchange experience, mostly because we just really liked each other: Gloria, it turned out, was a younger, Catalan version of my grandmother, except Gloria enjoyed sexier conversations.
Despite being raised by his Muslim mother, with a Muslim first name, Reza explains that he has been to many family Bar Mitvahs, never been in a mosque, and “feels more Jewish than Muslim.” One could attribute this to greater exposure to Jewish religious practice. But I find it interesting that it fits into the pattern I see in Jewish/Christian interfaith children of Judaism exerting an outsized effect, even when it’s the father who is Jewish.
One of my teachers told my class this back in grade school, and I’ve remembered it ever since. As a society, we have developed the uncanny ability to point fingers, make up white lies, or even shift blame, if it means that we can magically make something not our fault. In reality, people generally appreciate us taking responsibility for our actions instead of creating elaborate stories.
When will the bowing to ‘Islamic sensitivities’ come to end? When we live in a sharia-based society? When we submit to an Islamic state?
Terry White
-Gift cards
Noel Clarke - Mickey Smith
She gave him a smack on the back of the head with her order pad. “Don’t talk that way. Shoot, you’re so lucky. The other delivery guys, Doc makes them bus tables and stuff if there’s no calls. He lets you sit here and write.”
for the soup:
Soymilk Panna Cotta, Santa Barbara Sea Urchin, Geoduck Clam & Fresh Wasabi
This has got to be the easiest card that I've ever made, I put my back out last week and couldn't get my mind round anything too involved. My back is still painful and I'm still walking funny but I think it's getting better.
I've ran a couple of races that I didn't blog about, mainly because my personal paparazzi wasn't there to capture every moment, but for my journaling sake, I'm blogging about them and including the cell phone pictures of the two races.
The second reason is that we kept changing the status of our relationship every four to six months from monogamous to non-monogamous which did get frustrating at times for the both of us because though the idea was appealing neither one of us could stand the thought of one of us doing anything with someone else. Hence many tears and angry words when one of his may have acted on impulse during those open months.
Maybe it's because the northeast is so full of people who work in absolutes: the Yankees HATE the Red Sox and Boston HATES New York. Philadelphia HATES the Giants (and anything else that steps into their stadiums). Baltimore Ravens fans apparently just HATE. It's as if somehow those fans believe that their actual lives are bettered by their team beating another team, even though they neither know or control any of the players on the field. Or do they just have a deep-seated need to hate something?
Issue
Save their lives?
So, we can see that if I think rationally, I talk assertively. Because, I understand the following:
I love my divorce..................
KCBS’ Doug Sovern Reports:
23. Wasted Days and Wasted Nights -- Freddy Fender
Never did make much sense of the patterns after that, them moving from town. When the economy went South we had a very large turn over of people and now the economy is improving slightly the movement is beginning again.
I found myself a little in awe when she told me to “Be a good girl”.
Mix the egg whites and sugar together and add the other ingredients. Combine to form a sticky dough, cover with clingfilm and put in the fridge for half an hour or so.
Marlene sat back in a recliner, propping her feet up, holy sneaker and all. “According to Peg’s book,” Marlene said, “we have to collect all the herb and resin ingredients and grind them together. They, and a special charm paper, go into the doll right before we sew it up. After everything we bought today, we’re only missing the Kyphi oil, which you rub on the paper, the egg shells from a fertile black chicken, and the cemetery dirt.”
Where – Design Centre, Chelsea Harbour, SW10 OXE
And yet, at night, ‘tis such a sight
The Law Firm of Dutton & Casey, PC., is dedicated to serving older adults, persons with disabilities, and the people who care for them. Please go to www.duttonelderlaw.com for more information on our services and for additional resources.
Since we moved and my dad came into his money, shes popped back up on our radar, weird right? She's asked him for money because she needs food and OF course she isn't doing drugs anymore, so the money isn't for drugs. What the fuck ever! Nobody believes your bull shit. The worst part? Is she is making MY dad feel bad.
91-101.5
of a forty year old desk
-Putting you down to make myself feel better is wrong
Petal Dance
so it was just a completely pointless question
4 – I have won two office chess tournament, but i can’t win against my cousin brother who taught me how to play chess.
1 Sunny (Part I)
I'm reminded of The Outlaw Vern's comment on Smoking Aces, about how he was surprised to see the characters get sad when people they cared about started to die. Instead of the blaise reactions to death that had become the raison d'etre in crime films of the era. Here it's a similar reaction. Barrymore doesn't know she's in a horror movie. Up until ten minutes ago she was in a romantic comedy. As a result she is acting with actual horror. It should be remembered that the ultimate source of horror is the subversion of the norm. The unraveling of things. Most clumsy modern horror never even bothers to establish a norm to subvert.
Word sorting... not my best area. It is always the thing that gets left out when I am short of time - which is very often!! What I did last year with my class just isn't working with this bunch and with my schedule. Last year I had a very simple schedule. All students knew that on Day 1, they did ____ activity, on Day 2 they did _____ activity and so on. Each groups Day 1 was a different day. So, if I met with the Red Star group on Monday to introduce their new sort, that was their Day 1. But I met with the Blue Star group of Tuesday, so that was their Day 1 etc. It worked really well and the schedule took up hardly any space.
Natural gas is hailed by many as being the cleanest fossil fuel as it produces less carbon dioxide than either coal or oil. The gas can also be found in an abundance with resevoirs of natural gas deep underground in many locations in both Britain and Ireland, as well as the United States where a lot of the controversies have arisen from.
Asset tracing investigations
Fashionistas from Bristol and beyond will be heading to Cabot Circus this April for a series of free fashion shows presenting the hottest trends for Spring and Summer.
In the film, two railroads, both on lines out of St. Louis, were used in the filming. Those railroads are the Missouri Pacific Lines, and the Gulf, Mobile and Ohio Railroad. Unlike the Missouri Pacific, a railroad that we already discussed twice in two previous posts, “Things are Tough All Around”, a Cheech and Chong Movie, and “End of the Line”, a Wilford Brimely movie, the GM&O had not been in any other films that we discussed
She takes another sip of her rum punch. I’ve had eight of these already, they’re rather good, she tells me. If she’s had eight of ‘em I’m a trifle surprised she’s still upright but, a bit like a runaway train, she carries on regardless. My Mum’s Anna Capaldi… and I’m Eve. The penny is slowly dropping into the slot machine of memory. Gotcha – there aren’t that many people who’ve had a song written about them who I have met before.
There are some definite benefits to living alone. Oh, forget about the house being in foreclosure, the IRS's idle threats, the lack of money, my inability to sell my house or find another place to live that I can afford; or the worldly possessions I'm shoveling out of here faster than they came in . . . I can't do anything about any of that. So I dance in the dark.
I also love Pi’s psychological battle with the tiger, Richard Parker. It was funny at time, anxious at most. Pi’s sheer will and determination to survive made him smart and diligent in finding ways to live after being adrift with a tiger for more than seven months.
Here’s one from the second chapter that still makes me laugh: “When our boys were little, they found great joy in naked running. No, we didn’t raise them in a nudist colony, but that didn’t stop them from running naked wherever they could. Change a diaper without a new one ready to go, and they’d likely break free running naked. Give them a bath, get mostly dry, and sprinting naked would often ensue. They evidently found great joy and laughter in the hilarity of naked feet slapping the floor and unrestricted movement of clothing- free moments. We often would joke and call out ‘NAKED PARADE’ as they went by laughing. We even have a child who, if you sent him to the bathroom, would strip naked to poop. We called him the Naked Pooper. Thankfully, he only did this at home.”
Frances can look outside her window and see the organ grinder and his little monkey. At night, she can hear their mournful music playing on when everyone else is warm and safe in bed. Frances wishes there were some way she could help the organ grinder, but it’s the Great Depression, and everyone is struggling, even at Christmas. But when she gets up onstage as the angel in the Christmas pageant, she finds the organ grinder in the audience, and suddenly she realizes that she’s had the words all along that are able to bring peace and joy in hard times. This book is absolutely beautiful. Kate DiCamillo’s first foray into picture books is accompanied by breathtaking art from Bagram Ibatoulline (The Miraculous Journey of Edward Tulane). It’s the glow of Ibatoulline’s illustrations that makes this book unforgettable. It’s warm and inviting and wistful–everything I want to see in a (new) holiday classic.
Just back from a weekend away. Went to visit friends north of Seattle, just in time for the Tulip Festival. Thanks to the continuing cold (snow on those foothills) there were probably three field tulips blooming in the whole valley. But the daffodils were glorious! It made my heart soar to stand in the fields and drink it all in. And, as a bonus daffodil blooms were given to everyone attending the Easter services at the church I visited. It was wonderful in every way.
Sometimes they are elaborate. The strange dog in the neighborhood? He and his mama ride with a trucker who’s stopped for a while at the gas station a few blocks away. His mama’s done this route dozens of times and knows dogs all over, but she’s too old to climb up and down at every stop anymore. So she sends him around to visit all her friends and acquaintances, carrying her greetings and bringing back all the latest local canine gossip.
Here I am teaching my children, polarity, division, separation, superiority, inferiority and fear. And as hard as I tried to compact this into my pipe I could not get it to ignite. It could just not sit with me. I mean obviously it was not a mistake, nothing is. Everything that happens happens because it is meant to happen. It could look like a travesty, a crime, whatever, but it happens because it is the play of life. Arising from emptiness and dissolving into the same.
Mix goat cheese, honey, and thyme together, create log shape, roll in parchment paper or plastic wrap, chill in refrigerator.
- While I'm not even a Deist, as such, I've always found Shai-Hulud a more credible notion of a Deity than anyone who gave a damn about the fate of an individual human. And this quotation expresses an attitude toward the unknown that I can support.
Lieutenant = 10+ books
"Maintenance at the hospital is a disaster from top to bottom. There are always broken lifts, and heavily pregnant women have to trudge up the stairs. If it's not the lifts that are broken, the power back-up supply is not operational."
Today Junior Seau left before any of us were ready to let him leave. By all accounts Seau was a model NFL citizen. He was the consummate professional on the field and a charitable and philanthropic presence in the community off of it. But in the last years of his life he began to show the signs of instability just as he fallen brethren had. And so our final memory of him won’t be of his passion, his steely gaze as he sized up the unfortunate running back or receiver who crossed his path; it will be of an idol, alone with a pain he couldn’t share or defeat. It is maddeningly ironic that Seau’s death comes on the same day that 4 current and former New Orleans Saints players received their punishments for their roles in a bounty program designed to target and injure specific members of the opposition, injuries that could lead to the same outcome that befell Junior Seau.
Jade
“Shawn, what the hell is the matter with this computer?”
I have been wearing Agnes’ shoes since rehearsals began. She now has two pairs! The Act I shoes have sturdy leather laces and are a goes-with-everything taupe. But they also have modest heels and decorative scallops; practical but feminine in a quiet way, like Agnes herself. Agnes keeps a pretty tight lid on her emotions. She feels deeply, but rarely shows what is going on inside. And she is proper. Agnes would never cross her legs, even at the ankles. When I see one of my feet, clad in Agnes’ shoes, swinging in the air, I am instantly reminded that I am not fully in character.
I always choose my «ambient light» first. As the nickname of Maria is Fuchsia, the choice was simple. I painted the whole background layer in pink. I chose my palette according to this color. There are a lot of ways to do that easily. For example, you can create a pink layer over your basic palette and decrease it's opacity or change it's mode. I don't use greyscale, I hate that. It's a good way to achieve good contrast, but all your colors seem to be washed out. Once again, I know I can change the tones or add some later.
Whimsy Stamps is releasing 4 new Elisabeth Bell Little Cottage Cuties rubber stamps today and these new goodies are available to buy right now from the Whimsy Stamps store along with all your Whimsy favourites.
Since I've been engaged, I've ended 2 friendships.
free market
intimidation, harassment, physical attacks that occur with impunity for those
One life contained
I called them this morning, because I was registering a vehicle that I bought in Missouri. Since I was moving the title and registration from Missouri to Florida, I had to provide proof of insurance. That was when they gave me the bad news: For the last two weeks, I have had no insurance. Apparently, they did a routine check of my file, and discovered that my credit score had dropped since the last time they checked, and they say that makes me uninsurable. They didn't even bother to send me a letter or make a telephone call to tell me that I was not insured. If I had not called, the first hint that I would have had would have been if I got in an accident. They didn't even refund the premiums that I paid for the year in advance.
3 eggs, beaten
"Hmm, something nearby with eyes, too. But it's too nice a day to get worked up about it. I wonder if it eats frogs? Maybe I should think about that."
PAUL: Well, I think free trade is the answer. Free trade is an answer to a lot of conflicts around the world, so I’m always promoting free trade. And you might add Cuba, too. I think we would be a lot better off with Cuba, trading with Cuba.
diet wise. im pretty sure my diet is sabotaging everything. back at home… sigh. why even compare. back to researching.
I suggested "Rainbow Soup."
Greg Walton: “I actually really participated in the protest to actually support the teachers, missing class really wasn’t important, I notified my parents nights before that I actually might get suspended.”
In my Bioethics class today we talked about disabilities, and what constitutes a disability (deep stuff). With ten minutes left, my professor decided to touch upon a disorder known as Social Anxiety Disorder and then posed the question, “Why is shyness a disorder?”
I make my ear wires with 20 gauge wire. That is the perfect size for most piercings. Choose a bur cup that is slightly larger than your wire. The best bur cup for that gauge wire is a 1.0mm. It is just large enough to get the wire into it nicely. If you use 18 gauge wires for your earrings, then use a 1.3mm bur cup. Note: make sure you get the ID measurement (inside dia) and not the OD (outside dia) or your cup will be too small.
Born 25/4/13 in Tulsa, Oklahoma. Joined Terence Holder's Band at the age of 18.
Wow, from the moment I woke up this morning, I was exhausted.
If I was to surmise; I mentioned already that the city of Amsterdam itself is a decent city, nice buildings/architecture etc. The weather isn’t exactly what you’d go to a country specifically for. Yes there are a few attractions, I’m sure a few more other than the one’s mentioned (apart from the cafes and red light district) such as the museums et al.
Purchased:
View from our back windows
I want to stop and listen. I want to slow down and enjoy. I want to say the words that might seem embarrassing, but would mean so much. I want to make memories, and etch time with my laughter.
In fact, Fowler says, “I’ve struggled endlessly for the past four years, trying to develop this gift book; after all, Mother’s are the foundation of all humans around the world and certainly deserve something that commemorates their commitment.” He adds, “I also felt compelled to acknowledge those who helped establish this globally recognized day.”
How can you look me in the eye
Joey: Ohh, here it comes.
It made me think, why?
There's another trick I've learned, too, but it's late. I think I'll save that one for next week. I should also say that I know I had talked earlier about consequences that involve the cooperation of the child (like handing over a phone or doing extra chores). There is a time in your child's progress where that can work, and James (and I) are reaching it. In the past, we could not go there, and I needed to really learn to scale things back to the extremely simplified method above. Only very gradually can you introduce discipline in which the child struggling with RAD can take part in voluntarily giving up a privilege, or taking on a chore. Know your child, and tread lightly when moving forward. Sorry I did things kind of out of order, but I hadn't really planned this series out in terms of what and when I would introduce concepts. In other words, I'm flying by the seat of my pants here, so please bear with me. If you want to revisit any of the topics in attachment I've already covered, here are the links:
white rabbit stuffed animals for party favors (again, 99 cents at a pre-Easter sale), etc... The details just kept getting deeper. We started doing it at the same time as we were planning for Grace's party at the beginning of March. Grace's was elaborately planned too, and after the hordes (10 feels like hordes to me) of children left, I decided that we actually have MORE fun PLANNING than we do at the party. The same can be said for Harriet's birthday. We had such a great time planning and doing details, the party itself was almost an afterthought. Sure, the kids all had a great time, and of course the party is important, but few if any of them noticed or cared about what we did. I thought that would matter to me - that no one else cares about all our hard work and thoughtful detail, but I don't. Harriet cared, and she and I (and Grace) had more fun putting it together than anything.
To such a breeze
Mondays are Red was Nicola Morgan’s debut YA novel, published in 2002. Nicola is now delighted to be producing the ebook, with a new cover and brand new extra material, including creative writing by school pupils inspired by the book. For details about how to buy (price around £2.23) See here
Youngest just pointed out that he's still up....after 9 pm,
When I got the paint home, it still seemed closer to orange than gold, but I thought it would look different on the wall. I was wrong. It seemed more and more orange the more I painted. I finished the first coat and frowned. I thought a second coat might change my perception, but the color only intensified. I still thought that my eyes were deceiving me (surely the walls were golden, not orange), so, when Mike arrived home from a long day of studying for finals, I presented him with our pumpkin hallway.
First – I attend an Evangelical seminary, and have found the experience to be profoundly different from the perceptions I held when I was outside the camp.
But I am going to bring you back to the 1980s. This time, I’m going with bombast. I’m going with CinemaScope. I am going with Midge Ure and the rest of Ultravox. I am going with the over the top, completely sublime “Vienna”. Few songs are what their reputation leads you to believe they are. “Vienna” isn’t one of them. It is everything you have heard. It is just that grand. It’s a song I sing along with, at top volume, trying to out sing Midge Ure because damn it! I want to never hit number one on the U.K. charts because of “Shaddup You Face” as well.
I drove up the main street, up to the school. Being the largest building in the village by far, dwarfing the rows of coal miners cottages that surrounded and paid homage to it, it became the centre of village life. It was one long single-storey building but due to it’s enormously high ceilings, it looked from the outside that it would have at least three floors. A highly polished wooden corridor ran down the centre of the building like a major artery with classrooms off to the right and the main hall down the left. The infants were at the near end with the juniors down the opposite end with the headmaster’s office located at the far end on the left.
One additional external feature is machined into the damper body, a single damper valve. I believe this is a valve to compensate for the effect of heat on the volume of oil inside the casing. The valve offsets the thermal expansion of the oil to ensure there is a constant volume of oil within the damper cavity.
The negative results: there are two possible indicators of a chromosomal abnormality. The more serious of the two being that there is a high amount of fluid in both kidneys. This indicates either a blockage in the system somewhere or reflux, where the fluid is coming out but some of it is going back up again. This problem cannot be dealt with at all in utero and is something that we would deal with as we meet with the pediatrician after birth.
3) Tips for taking care of hair extensions/wigs~:
Let me state another obvious point – kids are ingenious little sponges that soak up all of this knowledge and they are now experts on how to use these iPads in the classroom and I believe they’re all better off for them. How exciting must it be for these kids, knowing that they’re the only classroom in the entire Natick school system with 5 iPads enhancing their learning experience? They think they’re rock stars and they’re pretty excited. Just ask them.
Because he loves you. Immensely. And enjoys your company.
Advice: Your vision is changing in many ways — you are experiencing new ways of seeing. Be patient. Whatever you do, do not be afraid. Hazy vision maybe relieved by yawning.
luv 'n' crafty hugs to you all
I have been largely MIA.
1/2 cup toasted walnuts
It's not like we need a plot by this time, but: Doctor Yano (Akira Yamauchi) is presented with a dried-up tadpole-like creature from a bay where fishing is no longer plentiful. The doctor, his wife (Toshie Kimura), his older nephew Yukio (Toshio Shiba) and youngest son Kenny (Hiroyuki Kawase) see a TV report about a gigantic beast made of sludge and floating garbage destroying an oil tanker, ascertain that it's the same kind of beast they have a smaller version of and try to discover just what it is and its purpose of being.
Dad = Octo-Daddy (of the cephalopod variety, not the 8 kids kind)
Monday – Rotisserie Chicken with mashed potatoes and veggies
They gathered in front of my locker and blocked me from getting my books. I ate lunch alone, under the stairs. It’s a total cliche. But it was my reality.
Serve with a delicious, chilled glass of The Good Earth’s Rosé!
He never walked with anyone.
Hubby and I left early ~ we had to get the cake there! AND everyone else was showing up at 6 to surprise them.
I now know why my life turned out the way it did. It was obviously a tragic result of something that did NOT occur during the miracle of my childbirth….. Obviously, my cash-strapped parents were too cheap to pay for the machine that goes “BIIIIINNNGGGG”. If I was afforded the opportunity to be brought into this twisted world with the assistance of the machine that goes “BIIIIINNNNGGGG”…..maybe my life would have been totally different……for this, I blame my parents!
At the end of the letter, the scene cuts to show the opposite side of Fonda. Morgan is off to the left, only a sliver of the back of his head showing. His illiterate character has understood the words as fully as anyone else in that saloon, and we know it from the brim of his hat, as it drops with his head in a gesture that isn't only respect for the dead. Andrews' character spent the last hour of his life knowing he was innocent and he was going to die, and then he did die, strangled at the end of a rope. From the back of Morgan's head, barely in frame, we know the drifter won't ever be able to defend himself from his memories by saying the dead man was a fool. Then the camera, after seeking out the men from the posse once more, moves higher to show the length of the bar and Morgan in the middle. His one good hand is still wrapped around his glass, he still looks in the same direction, but he stands straighter. Then Morgan turns to follow Fonda with a slightly saddle-weary gait.
Most types of Mizuno running shoes use the Mizuno wave technology. Some of them are neutral running shoes like Mizuno Wave Creation 11 running shoe, which is engineered for the runner with medium-to-high arches for maximum cushioning and impact protection, and stability shoes like Mizuno Wave Nirvana 6 running shoe which provides support to the medium-arched, flexible foot type.
Super easy and fun to do AND the best part.. It is totally custom made so you know that if you give this baby away to someone special you will be a Rock-Star! - promise :) I have a tutorial on how to make the card and candle on this Momenta Blog post:
Brian Tracy has studied the science of success for the past 30 years, and he's now a best-selling author, sought-after coach and speaker, and a multi-millionaire who lives what he teaches. For a limited time, he's offering you a chance to read the FIRST chapter of his book, "No Excuses - The Power of Self-Discipline."
If you have never been to a Tweetup, it is essentially just a meeting of people who use Twitter regularly. The one in Ealing has had several years to grow now and so it is one of the largest groups of social media experts in London – but nobody is charging to be there, nobody is making speeches. Everyone can see the list of who will be attending and everyone is welcome.
To presint my surrender,
The idea for my first project, and my favorite, came in the shower. (Isn't that when most of the ideas come?) My daughters love it when I make projects for them so this one was perfect.
The Baskerville case had now become the Farmer Claims Class Action Lawsuit. Worried about the legal ramifications the government retaliated against the farmers by hitting them with either outrageous IRS fees, or by imprisoning the legal team under frivolous nonrelated charges. When the farmers realized they were being unfairly targeted, they had military generals such as General Roy Schwasinger sit in the courtroom to make sure the bribed judges would vote according to constitutional law.
Nick is dictating. I am typing. Brace yourselves...
He arrives home and calls for the servants, but of course there’s nobody there. He goes into his bedroom and kneels beside the bed to pray, but before he can get far, he sees the servant girl stretched out, naked, and very, very dead. He totally freaks out and runs out of the room, screaming for help.
As I said, being in remission during the time that this book was being in remission helped in ways I can only appreciate now, as someone experiencing the beginnings of a relapse but still writing. Being sick, without a doubt, impacts a person’s writing. If there isn’t a medication giving you brain fog and making you forget half the stuff you planned to write, there’s the fact that you’re clinging to a toilet for dear life and picking up a pen and paper is the last thing on your mind. It boils down to the moments in between, when things are quiet. The pressure is on to squeeze as many meaningful words onto paper in those rare moments as possible.
So the winner for April 17 is - #7 Ava
It warms my heart to hear someone say that their dreams are to "work with new authors" because that's really what publishing is all about. So many people go into this business because they want to be writers. I'm not sure I ever wanted to be a writer, but I wanted to be a part of the process, which is why my job is perfect for me. I get to work to my strengths and hopefully encourage authors to work to theirs.
I watched her all the way.
Just a half-hour after leaving Dar es Salaam, our shaky 12-seater approached a dirt-and-gravel runway. As we made our descent, a few sparks of civilization flashed into view: a lone wooden dhow patrolled the coastline; a trio of gleeful children pointed up at the plane from the edge of a marshy mangrove; two women wrapped in colorful kangas, traditional African dresses, and headscarves walked by with large clay pots balanced on their heads.
The Small Back Room
According to this story, Director Mujica announced in February of this year that he would be closing off access to the library’s collection of rare books so that a thorough inventory could be taken.
Never give up on what God has already pre-ordained for you. Stand tall, stand strong. Persevere, be patient. Be kind and bless others. Pour into others and others will eventually pour into you.
“I couldn’t live my life because I always had baseball. I missed out on parties in middle school, friends birthdays and just having time to hang around and have fun. Not to mention we weren’t supposed to swim before games in the summer,” Nick said. To put it simply, there were other things he wanted to be doing.
About a year ago, quite by accident, i discovered the key to happiness. Lol. First, i had cleaned their room of all game systems, ereaders, mp3, computers, etc. everything was moved into my bedroom closet. I wanted to start teaching them the value of the dollar, at that time. So i made each child a poster that looked like a checkbook register. The concept was they could earn fictional 'bucks' and use these bucks to get games and such. I was SHOCKED to realize it was a hugely effective behavioral tool as well.
The bottom line is this. In 2008 a compelling body of evidence exists that there is progressive brain dysfunction in alcoholic clients. This brain dysfunction is measureable and supported in the scientific literature. What follows is the research verification for the Post Acute Withdrawal Syndrome (PAW) Syndrome. This evidence is summarized in the following Alcohol Alert.
The reality is that institutions such as Churches and Schools don’t need government support to exist. These establishments can thrive on their own through the commitment of community members, and also through the grace of God if the community prays to the right God in all earnesty. There’s ample evidence to prove that this has been achieved in many places on earth, even in times of severe misery and depression. I’m sure readers will understand if I don’t provide examples here.
the token for rent
i am in a blog rut again. if you count not blogging at all as a rut instead of a failure, which i do because i am trying to be positive.
Lunch was huge! I ate every last bit of it. Kind of a replay from the past few days. A microgreen salad, tempeh, brown rice, avacado, carrots, and a cucumber salad (good thing I love cucumbers, because I have to eat alot!) Why is the photo upside down? Because I have to hang upside down for 20 minutes before I eat….hehehe kidding.
I offer my life blood into your hands,
You won’t be asked your social class, nor what salary you earn, but if you dealt both fair and square with others in your turn.
To my surprise, it was a list of hotels in New Orleans, Louisiana.
Desperate, military and political men in Russia’s top circles turned to Peter’s wife – the mother of his purported son and heir, Paul. For the start of his reign she had been out of commission – pregnant with another child by a dashing Russian officer. Peter, meanwhile, had taken a mistress he much preferred to Catherine and hoped to replace her. But after giving birth, Catherine quickly reasserted her influence and seized the reins.
06-21 Milan, Italy – Alcatraz
i have this ikea ottoman that we've had for years.
There are some personal training sessions that I am really thankful that I only meet with him for a half hour once a week. Today was one of those days. 3 sets of 5 exercises (some of which varied). I struggled through it all. The first exercises was walking lunges while holding a weighted ball in front of you (arms outstretched). On the down lunge, I had to turn towards the “open” side. So when I step forward on the right leg, I move the ball and twist my torso to the right. The ball was only a six pound ball... I never claimed to not be a weakling! On the last set, I had to hold the ball over my head—arms straight was the goal. That so didn’t happen. I didn’t have to twist though which meant the lunges went faster. I finished... but the last three steps were a killer. Oh, and sometime during the half hour, he says to me “You’re not as talkative as you usually are”. And I’m preparing for another exercising trying to catch my breath that was being so very elusive today. He was quite pleased. A couple weeks back, he accidentally set the weight to be heavier than he intended. I thought it felt heavy but hey, he’s the trainer and maybe I was just feeling tired. When he realized what he’d done, he said “Well, that’s a good discovery”. Since then he’s increased the difficulty of the sessions. Near the end of today, he said “If it’s any consolation, this is significantly more difficult than a couple weeks ago. You’re doing really well. Much better than many other people would have done.” It wasn’t much of a consolation in the moment, but it does make me very happy. By pure luck I had decided to double the amount of protein shake to take to the gym today. I’ll still be super sore tomorrow but I’m really growing to love these sessions.
Blazer, Walmart ($12)
and the soft rain –
- slush reading (!)
Praising God for having His hand on this new medicine and treatment! He has ended my awful suffering! I have less pain that is functional now and feel as though a fog has been lifted. Praying it is allowed to last :)
Democratic Candidates
Three cannot be one it is mathematically impossible.
So I googled them, and got a rather boilerplate website that listed the management but not the ownership and so forth. This, I'm starting to think, is fairly common for energy supply companies right now, a few guys in a room with a reasonably snazzy website, a background in selling phone service, and a bunch of unanswered questions about what generators they buy their electricity from and at what price.
The conversation ended at around 9:30pm and was followed by a reception for all, which, like the private dinner, was catered by ISKCON devotees. There, audience members had an opportunity to meet Radhanath Swami and Dr. Cornel West, as well as to purchase their books at the University bookstore, which had been specially contracted to sell them.
This was my art submission for Red Engine 1yr anniversary gallery show.
1952
My freshmen took their English CSTs yesterday, and last night I got a bad case of the CST Blues. I was a basket case—puddle-on-the-floor basket case.
The countdown is on!
Your five desert island books...
I really enjoyed this book considering I had to trudge through the first book, Gone. The titles totally make sense in this series since in this book, Hunger the food in the FAYZ has been quickly been eaten away and the kids are left to eat cabbage and other sorts of foods left in the fields.The pacing picked up a lot since the first book. The first book sort of dragged but the series gets better, promise. Starting from the first few pages, Hunger had action all throughout the novel. I loved it!
Our friends Kevin and Lori own Mermaid Isle and opened up the cottage for us. The peat fire inside, the secluded beach outside, the utter quiet. Ahhhh...reflection. And none too soon. The cough that had started creeping up on me in Lahinch had turned into viral pneumonia.
3. Paste the url into the appropriate inlinkz box in this post.
I passed by a bandstand with Sharon, Nathan and Kelly. It was every time I'd ever passed a bandstand rolled into one. I was walking past a bandstand with friends, like I'd done before. With different friends. It was new and it was old. I looked over the fence and so did they. How many people had done the same before us? Friends, looking down at the beach, possibly hundreds of thousands. They had felt the warmth of camaraderie that I was now feeling. I felt a deep fondness for my companions. A comfort that was beyond this instant, that was curiously eternal, shared with my past, present, and future.
Ink is Staz-on in Forest Green
And then these celebrities feel they have to speak out and justify whatever it is they have done. In Stacey Solomon's case she is publicly apologising for what she is doing.
A former first runner-up to Mrs. United States, Tosca received her B.A. from Smith College in Massachusetts. She also studied at Oxford University. For more info visit Tosca's website at www.toscalee.com.
I sincerely hope this helps. I'll respond to your questions in the comments section of this post. Now go buy some YA literature! (I've got some great suggestions; just read my reviews so far.)
A List/itinerary has been heavily prepared for our trip. It includes Top of the Rock (photo above), Empire State, Grand Central Station, SoHo, West Village, the Highline, Central Park, Brooklyn and, an infinite list of deli's, bagel bars and pizza places...
Place eggs in medium pot and then cover with water by approximately one inch. Heat on high until the water starts to boil and then remove from heat, cover and let sit for 15 minutes. Rinse under cold water and peel.
We sometimes realize that we are not living our best life and when we are in deep thought, someone comes and asks us or a cup of coffee and we forget everything that we were thinking and get busy in everyday chatter. I mean how can we allow someone to control our thoughts? So the best practice, as so many of the motivational speakers and leaders suggest, is to keep writing your thoughts, feelings and goals and keep reminding yourself after every 30 minutes because we tend to forget so easily! Write your goals on a flash card and keep it in your pocket and keep reminding yourself about them every 30-45 mins. Put an alarm on your mobile which rings every 30 mins and reminds you of your goals.
“I’ll be so glad when you’re 10,” I tell him, slipping the car into park under the awning in front of the grocery store. An eyebrow shoots up over his sweating cone.
I feel a little bit more like myself today.
And the pensioners themselves are played by an all-star cast of golden-nuggety British greats: Bill Nighy, Maggie Smith, Judi Dench (right), Tom Wilkinson, Penelope Wilton and Celia Imrie.
Here is what Johnny had to say…
I hope 2012 brings you happiness and adventure!
Shadows in Flight is smoothly written, with a nice pace and good dialogue and characterization, albeit not quite to the level of Card's finest work, such as Speaker for the Dead and "Unaccompanied Sonata." I think Card made a good choice introducing another ship for Bean and his children to encounter; we needed an additional story element or the family tensions would have become tedious. But I'm not crazy about having the alien craft be a bugger ship. It doesn't add up -- the hive queens can all communicate anywhere telepathically, and Ender's hive queen in Speaker for the Dead and Xenocide was very clear that she was the only one left after the war. More importantly, bringing the Formics back into the story makes this book feel like a rehash of previous volumes.
I’m going to have a heart attack.
but without it our identity is lost.
skeptical; doesn't like grass touching her feet
The company began with concept of unique denim that fits a range of diverse body types, not just model size zeros. Today’s enhanced fit selection includes such notable names as The Honey, The Provocateur and The Visionaire. In the past 10 years, Joe’s has added a casual, chic lifestyle collection for men, women and kids.
Missing documents don’t have to prevent trusts from foreclosing on homes because the paperwork may not be necessary, according to Platt. Defects in the required documents can be fixed in some circumstances, he said. For example, a missing promissory note, in which a borrower commits to repay a loan, may not derail the process because there are laws governing lost notes that allow a lender to proceed with a foreclosure, he said.
It seems kind of foolish of Roger Vadim to begin the movie with a striptease which is more fleetingly revealing than anything else in the film, starting it on an erotic high that it can’t quite live up to. Still, it’s an iconic, much-swiped moment, and it’s eventually followed by THIS:
DARKNESS RISING is a fantastic cartoon, expertly striking the right balance between being accessible to kids and engaging for adults. It’s got lots of love for old school TRANSFORMERS, yet it clearly moving in its own, exciting direction. I was a bit nervous, at first. I wasn’t thrilled with the computer-generated animation and there’s far too much emphasis on the human kids (of course, I pretty much want no humans in my TRANSFORMERS stories), but both of them grew on me to varying degrees.
The game of what will be known as poker in the future travelled through times and continents to Egypt, India and Persia where it became known in the 12th-13th centuries as “Ganjifa”, which can be translated as “The Treasure Cards”. Such cards were made of very thin pieces of rare wood or even ivory and were only affordable to the very rich. The game reached Europe in the 16th century and became very popular first in Italy and Spain known as “Primero”, then in France named “Poque” and in Germany called “Pochen”. It was Europe that introduced suits to cards from the Italian tarot cards.
All of your vistors will have laid their eyes on your house number simply because it’s what lets them know they have arrived at the correct location.
Even creativity takes effort and patience, practice until the lines fall into the right places. Till others also appreciate… Maybe you don’t even have to deal with rejection, because if your work is ghastly and expensive enough, people will buy it because they have so much money it’s newsworthy to pay that much for something so poor. You get attention for your bad choices. And then you can defend them. Another distraction.
Back to the box for a sec. Here's a pic of the empty box, in case you haven't seen one before. As I mentioned, it's made with just 2 scallop envelopes & a strip of scored card adhered between them.
I started with her poached eggs, which taste the same as the usual poached eggs. But it took so long to read the instructions before and during the process that my I started to believe these would be The Poached Eggs to End All Poached Eggs.
ME: Why is it funny? You take the pictures and I process them. We compliment each other. We’re like two peas in a pod.
First I want to share the layout I made for this project sheet. I am in scrappy heaven with it, really fun, the papers and embellies really make it pop.
Florida Representative Alan Williams made a visit to the Adult Community Education campus Thursday morning to speak to students. Williams, a member of the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee, helps make decisions about the funding for Adult Education in Florida.
So I have been sponsoring a community in the Trincomalee area of Sri Lanka via ChildFunds. To be specific, I am sponsoring Prabodhika and her community. Its the least I can do for being anti-baby.
Here is the back view--you can see where I have increased for the gusset. It's been sitting like this since Monday--I think. I'm scared to start on the heel!!! I need to have a couple of uninterrupted hours to work on this so I pay attention this time. Love the color and the yarn--it is soft and very easy to work with. I actually finally remembered that the lady I got the pattern from has videos to show you how to do each step--I'm not sure what is up with my memory lately but it isn't doing well at all!!!
What I didn’t add in the piece is the fact that this was the last time I have seen her; Hali (not her real name, obviously) moved to the East Coast the next day. She was supposed to come visit here in June, but she is 8 months pregnant and won’t be able to come out.
It is a vagina I swear!
8:22 - Romney is asked why said he was a "severely conservative governor." He massages his unfortunate word choice: "severe — strict." Then he segues into fiscal conservatism.
Jesus tells us that we will receive whatever we ask in His name! Not only that, but we are also given this amazing promise: We will do even greater things than He was doing. This really is just the beginning! Two things are key: 1. We have to ask God in Jesus’ name! (pray and know that every prayer is heard because of and through Jesus alone) 2. We have to believe in God’s power and ability, love and willingness. (have faith)
"The Motor Boat"
Luckily, the leaves will soon begin to fall and I've become more comfortable with the first step, the leap.
Psalm 54:4 Behold, God is my helper; the Lord is the sustainer of my soul.
This is my friend Lauren (who has very good taste...she picked out the necklace I'm wearing). She's six years old, which is the age that I was when I met her mom. Lauren's mom, Nicole, used to be my mumzy's boss. When I would go in to see my mum at work, Miss Nicole would stop her meetings and take me to her office and brush my hair while I played on her computer. Miss Nicole is a big part of some of my favorite childhood memories...she took me to see my first ballet, she gave me several very, very beautiful children's books (all of which I still own), and when she took me to the Renaissance Festival she bought me a gorgeous ring and she let me get my hair braided.
Palesa Lamula and her sister Bontle Sebeko were leaving a tavern in Phiri, Soweto, when the attack happened last Thursday evening.
“Lellum Breeno Gor Tzzze Tro Brillum Rorr Sshe” The Young Man hisses at the lot of them.
5.When the mix cook well, add pumpkin paste.mix well.cook for 10 min in low flame.
I can get down with any kind of grilled cheese. American on doughy white, Vermont sharp cheddar on whole wheat, Raclette on sourdough. You grill it, I'll eat it.
How about some earrings? Even the mosts inexperienced crafter can make them. Here's a dainty pink pair I made:
Add the marscarpone and , either by hand or with electric beaters, cream it into the chocolate mix. Be careful not to whip it too much or it may split:
34Then Peter said, Truly, I see clearly that God is no respecter of persons:
I want to challenge myself with my baking.
But I took a deep breath and said "Yeah, whatever. Here's your violation." Then I had Miz Pieces escort him out with the OJT following to observe.
Just so you know it, it was all worth it. :D
While it is good to biblically submit to Godly authorities, Bevere confuses it and delivers a burden-binding ‘gospel’ message. While his book seems to promote a lot of truth, there are concerns that should be bought to light on his false gospel of salvation-by-submission.
Sen. David Hoyle, a Democrat from Gaston County, says he heard similar arguments from government officials decades ago when city halls were eager to get in on the business of selling electricity. Several dozen North Carolina towns, including Wilson, joined to buy a share in utility-owned power plants, and now their residents pay some of the highest power bills in the state.
Everything from here on out is for trade...
just kiss my neck and try to breath
Almost a month later came the tragic end to the catastrophic love story. On the fateful evening of April 20, 2000, Harpreet started vomiting. Loose motions followed, resulting in acute dehydration. At about 9.45 pm, Bibi Jagir Kaur called up Dr Tarsem Singh asking him to immediately proceeding towards Phagwara to attend to her ailing daughter Harpreet Kaur”. No connection between the illness and the previous incident was established.
There are a number of factors that are having an impact on our high streets now. Certainly the recession is one of them, no question: people are going out of business because there isn’t as much money in the system. There’s also online shopping, which is of course taking some of the spend away and forcing retailers to close shops.
2 drawing
MY NAME IS MARTIN AND I’M AN APPLE-HOLIC
In this side view photo, I tried to capture the sparkle from all the stickles. It's really sparkly and pretty in person!
BLACK-OWNED BUSINESSES
Favorite TV Comedy Actress
What would we do
15. Puka Puka Pants
Both USA schools had well over 90% vaccinated against measles. The vaccinators claim a 90% vaccination rate among any specific population guarantees herd immunity for that population. This bogus claim serves to create more revenue while blaming non-vaccinators for endangering humanity.
In 2007, Feldman was chairman of the Leaders’ Club, a dining group for Tory donors who each gave a minimum £50,000 to party funds each year – they would have lunch or dinner in Mr Cameron¿s office in the Common
Motherhood is a divine calling---but it may not always feel that way. Now you can show the women in your life how much they matter to you, with this delightful and heartwarming volume of wit and wisdom about the divinity, reality, and rewards of motherhood. Fresher than flowers and sweeter than chocolate, it's a perfect gift for the women who give so much.
The DEA is an evil organization. They do not make the world better. They are a waste of tax dollars. And Obama has done nothing to stop them, and in fact has empowered them.
2) If the “meaning” of language/symbols is nothing more nor less than everything that has been accomplished through the use of individual, concrete tokens, then the phenomenal vocabulary cannot function by referring to anything private. This is functional-role semantics and it is unique to Wittgenstein among this group (although other philosophers, such as Pragmatists, also develop this sort of operationalist account of language). It is soft; the ontological status of qualia is not addressed directly.
I float to the door.
For the first 10 seconds, I thought somebody was moving something large, heavy, and loud on the floor below which was causing an unholy vibration. Then, when the bookshelves started shifting a foot to each side, I realized something was wrong and that it was an earthquake.
Summer is here, and barbecues with it -- a favourite Brussels occupation.
The Plimsouls’ Beach Town Confidential was produced by Peter Case and mixed by Peter and Andrew Bush. It will be released Feb. 7, 2012 though Alive Naturalsound Records on LTD. Edition Vinyl (w/ mp3 download card), CD and Digital formats. In addition, Alive is also producing an extremely limited run of 200 pink vinyl LPs (w/ download card) exclusive to mail orders only.
You have a rigorous tour schedule around the whole of East
Great Confidence Is No Sign.
From observation of the activity of Trend Micro's browser, TROJ_FOOBACE.A until now is not the case of data theft techniques. However, Trend Micro, still gives a warning that users remain wary of traps for free nuanced this Valentine theme.
Indeed, the day that the UK enters ecological debt has crept forward dramatically in recent decades. In 1961, it wasn’t until July 9 that we ceased to be self-sufficient.
FACT NINE: My favourite TV programme is Frasier, by a long way. Followed by anything with detectives in.
Orangish color with orangish-white serious head. Hop-bite citrus smell, but light. Head is thick with vigorous pour, so I gotta kinda wait it out. Light malt smell as well as it warms a touch. Strong hops, light AT however. Oh yeah, nice stuff. Maybe closer to an regular IPA as opposed to the American version. A little residuey on the tongue-feel after the fact. Not my favorite IPA, but I like the rush of hops. It’s tilted toward hops instead of malt. Very drinkable, low carbo. Nice stuff. I put the Jockamo ahead of this one, but definetly one of the top beers coming out of the St. Arny camp, save Divine Reserve. 3 stars.
Last week, in the wake of the Trayvon Martin case, I wrote about wearing a hoodie at night while walking my dog and possibly frightening some pedestrians. That prompted an insightful response from Judy Maltenfort.
Right now, there is a huge void when it comes to customer service in retail and now is your chance differentiate yourself from your competition. I don’t care if you are small and you’re competing against a big box. You can succeed this season.
Fall Hard Ticket Events:
This is our role! This is our calling! This is our responsibility and privilege! Unconditional, unselfish, never wavering, life costing love that will penetrate her heart. It is this love that will encourage her! It is this kind of love that will give her the desire and willingness to submit and subject herself. I strongly believe that a woman will never submit to a man that will not love her.
01. Psycho Killer
Capel Dewi,UNITED KINGDOM
it was also helpful to have a personal photographer in the form of eric to take all of these photos which i promised to rip off of him so that for once in my blogging life it would look like i had a fancy camera.
They just had to believe and trust and have faith that the One that was providing for every.basic.need they had was true.
- Sam 'Ace' Rothstein (Robert DeNiro): "Casino"
Ad house Wieden+Kennedy created a mural to display such a divergent approach.
(content below from youtube info on the video. also a list of all sponsors on site)
Brad informed me today that the kids are no longer allowed to play unsupervised as apparently fist fights broke out last night when they were in the middle of a game
We have Sally Lamb, sitting at home, writing a letter (presumably to sailor boy in the photo on the table)
Another idea, in the event a 1911 is unavailable, is to take a picture of it next to a dollar bill. Give us SOMETHING Mr. Photographer. I mean the pistol floating in a white limbo is a great picture-taking trick, but I want more info. That's fine, but ALSO give us a proper picture for scale in your magazine spread. I prefer the 1911 comparison above, personally. That's great.
Well, let’s get down to it. I ordered the Red Smitty tortilla wrap and it came out much like a burrito, but cut in half. Gooey cheese lined the inside of the tortilla, surrounding beautiful and smoky chorizo. You could taste that they had grilled the chorizo which gives even deeper flavors to the wrap. Throw in some chipotle for additional smokiness and my add-in of black beans and you’re almost there. The real star of the Red Smitty was the egg, though. It was light and fluffy and had such a fresh taste to it. Unable to resist one of my favorites, I asked for plantains on the side and they were fried very well and oh-so-sweet.
I don’t often go out at night when I’m at OSU, but a friend of mine is in a Portland-based band and they had a show at Bombs Away Cafe in Corvallis, so I thought I’d go out and have a good time. I knew there would be a few people from my high school, but I invited my old roommate and her roommate came along too.
So here is the book that is now waiting to be printed and shipped to my mum for Christmas, here is my life in one year (click the images for a larger picture).
2.timer
"People might think it is a bit of a laughable affliction but I have a genuine fear of greens it's not just that I dislike the taste of sprouts or broccoli, but the actual sight of them fills me with dread and I could never touch them."
Granted, a bird’s nest is no big deal around here. They have arranged themselves in many odd places, but never the toy bin. I checked it out, it seemed empty so I discarded it on the ground and went about my work. At the grand finale of my porch cleaning (after driving around in the ATV for a bit — I get distracted easily) I finally got around to sweeping the patio. Sweep, sweep, sweep. I look over in the grass and think, “What the heck is that?” At first I thought some giant spider or bug was in the nest (I have bad eyes) it turned out to be 5 baby birds! Crap. I run to my husband and tell him about the misfortune of these “dead” little birdies. After his refusal to deal with the birds, I begrudgingly headed back to scoop them up and discard them. Double crap! They were still alive!! Now what? I have completely destroyed their nest and now I am gonna end up killing them because their Mama bird won’t be able to find them. (Insert extreme guilt and panic and maybe I almost cried).
I may not!
- Your eldest daughter.
It came out of a conversation between her and her sister about vacation - spending time running on a nice sandy beach...somehow turned into running in a half marathon in the desert sand! NOTE TO SELF: never discuss vacation plans with Beth's sister!!!! LOL!!!
Congratulate yourself and feel good about a trade when you have done what you were supposed to do, according to your trading plan–regardless of the profit or loss on the trade.
Because of one woman's desire to protect innocent children at risk of such exploitation, G.R.O.W was founded. Faa is a young woman after my own heart, and the ministry that she is providing to 8 at-risk children inspires me. We had an opportunity to eat dinner and have a worship service with the children. Please continue to pray for the GROW ministry with the wisdom to make several decisions with expansion.
Black Pepper : 2 tsp
You don't collapse into tears.
THIS is why I no longer support the NHS - a once compassionate and caring organisation that now looks to save cash by enforcing discrimination and neglecting unpopular social groups to death.
is an organization whose mission is
Add turmeric, and masala powders mix well and let it blend for 2 mins.
As she passed on her way up, he twirled around to watch her, a mesmerised automaton, forever in love.
I actually considered selling it on eBay, but decided against it. She bought it with her money. For us to sell it and take the money, in my mind anyways, is just theft, even from my own kid. I tried digging through the more than 30,000 (!) comments on the posting to see if I could get a screen shot to prove this, but it was too time-consuming. After trying for a while, I realized it wouldn't matter if I proved it anyway. For at least a few people, it didn't. Last night I read some discussion threads that went like this:
a) If you could have two whole weeks for vacation and go and do anything you wanted, what and
So this year, for the first time, I am completely at peace with my listening center. The generous donations from DonorsChoose made it possible for my students to listen to books of their own choosing. They can always see the words and pictures and never have to sit among a tangled mess.
Thank you for stopping by today. I wish for you a blessed and beautiful day, and I encourage you to look around for the angel in your own life, and celebrate them today. Granny would love that!!!!
Instead of colliding and arguing
in days of auld lang syne?
Lisa Genova is a writer that is well known - her book Still Alice, is still topping charts. Her latest, Left Neglected, is just as intriguing. I think what makes Genova so interesting to me is her background in neuroscience - you can tell she has this as she writes - she has insight into these conditions that many would not have. Left Neglected is fabulous - it is the story of Sarah Nickerson - whose story is like many others - a career-driven, fast-paced life with three kids. But it all changes one day during her commute to work - she looks down to make a phone call and doesn't realize that cars are stopping on the freeway ahead of her...
Took the weekend off and brought my wife and little girl to the KBON radio listener appreciation party in Rayne this weekend. The weather was short sleeve cool and not a cloud in the sky. There were numerous Cajun and Zydeco bands performing on stage,
Another time, she told my sister Maura and I that we could have the next day off school and she was taking us to Dublin. What a day we had, lunch at Woolworth's self serve counter. Shopping on Moore Street, walking up Grafton Street, finished off by tea at Bewley's Cafe.
Sarah Palin herself has chosen not to react to this incident, probably conscious of the fact that a January 20th CNN story held that she may be turning people off by overexposure. She did publish a powerful rebuttal to Obama's State of the Union address. On Conservatives4Palin, one person noted that "Despite the apology, this episode isn’t going to help the NBA broaden its appeal beyond urban liberals". C4P hasn't moved beyond the orchestrated "righty-lefty" split yet. The elite continue to deliberately promote the so-called "righty-lefty" split as a mechanism to deflect Americans, particularly the White community, from thinking about race, along with the fact that race replacement is taking place in the United States. Or, at the very least, to cow people into believing that such replacement is inevitable, natural, and even desirable.
Row 13-20- repeat row 12 (60)
Usually, I try to stay focused on living with offering generosity to others, in whatever ways I can… I may not have been noticing how much others are offering to me….and to each and every person in my life, from the very bottom of my heart….I thank you…
Soon a small alcove came into view where a young man sat, ankles crossed and tucked underneath the seat, his hands flat on the stone bench. He faced his garden with a blissful, quiet expression. When he saw her, he smiled handsomely, standing up. “I made something for you,” he said brightly.
:: wondering down the beach farther, I found a conch shell... bigger than my fist and broken by the rocks to reveal the coil inside... I smuggled it home, customs might not have approved
Defense attorneys say the analysis appeared to be a miracle of science: It required a small nuclear reactor, once housed at an FBI lab at the Hoover Building in Washington, D.C., and relied on the expertise of only a handful of qualified FBI agents.
Oh be proud of him
Taken from iconic literary works housed in Faber and Faber’s 80-year archive, the vintage book covers were the muse for the company’s new collection.
I read literally hundreds of books a year, most of them teen or upper middle-grade. (I am not exaggerating. On a good day with no interruption, I can read three full teen novels in a 10 hour period.) I don't like books with kids getting molested, or that have incest, or include gory, unnecessary violence, so I don't read books like that. Yet, I still manage to read tons of books every year.
2 visit
her barking a rest.
I'm sure his excuses are just as good for this as the whole "Fast and Furious" insanity. Again, the good 'ol FBI trying to stop terrorists by aiding and abetting them.
Enough Said....
Thanks SO much for stopping by and having a wee peek at my MFT Teaser for today! Please hop on over to Kim's blog for a list of links to all the other MFT Designers with sweet creations to share with you today.
Hair of the Dog Doggie Claws, 2008. I had only a mouthful of this--enough to confirm it remains in perfect, tasty form.
Back to the Beading Babes: the projects that we chose this month have provided the group with some challenges, which is kind of awesome if you think about it. And it has been really nice to see this group work together to figure things out and find the root of the problems!
Even though I’ve gained two precious children, I do feel some sense of loss. Loss of my fertility, loss of 12+ weeks of my pregnancy, loss of special moments like a maternity photo shoot (there is only one picture of me pregnant) and my baby shower which was postponed from this past Saturday. But, I have to keep focus on what I’ve gained and continue to be strong for my beautiful peanuts. I will be putting together a new blog to chronicle our NICU experience and our new children’s lives. I plan to update this with PCOS / infertility related entries and thoughts, but it won’t be as frequent. I will post a link to the new blog and would love to have all of you subscribe and follow along. I appreciate all of the love and support you’ve provided throughout my infertility and pregnancy journey.
12. Forbidden Planet
It’s common for people to go to great lengths and expense in the pursuit of beauty. Cosmetics, fashion and even the medical industry vie for your attention and dollars. There are a million ways to enhance your physical beauty. How much will it cost? Will you ever be satisfied? Will you really feel more beautiful? Following are a series of suggestions that offer a holistic and spiritual approach to the more beautiful you.
Blogroll Presentation
Sometimes I just need extra time to learn the basics.
Our home smells so pretty~
Let us drink anew to the time when you
There is here a compilation of points made by Warmist scientists which criticize a talk given by Prof. Lindzen -- who is a fairly conventional climate scientist but who thinks that the effects of rising CO2 levels on terrestrial temperature will be trivial. And on the principle that the past is the best predictor of the future, they certainly will be.
Johannes Vermeer’s “Girl With A Pearl Earring” will come to the De Young Museum in San Francisco next January (2013), the first stop on a three-venue American tour of paintings from the Royal Picture Gallery Mauritshuis, the Hague.
“A mountain is composed of tiny grains of earth. The ocean is made up of tiny drops of water. Even so, life is but an endless series of little details, actions, speeches, and thoughts. And the consequences whether good or bad of even the least of them are far-reaching.” Sivananda
I should be studying for my linguistics final.
Well, I'm sure any sane person would:
Onto another friend's house to watch Eurovision, which was highly entertaining as always!
Let the experiment begin!! Giggle.
Jaglom came to Hollywood from New York as a playwright and actor. He became involved in Lee Strasberg's Actor's Studio alongside, Jack Nicholson, Bruce Dern, Diane Ladd, and Peter Fonda. As an actor, Jaglom was contracted at Columbia Studios, and landed acting roles on television shows like, THE FLYING NUN and GIDGET. As the 70's approached, Jaglom worked on several projects in front and behind the camera, including working as an editor on Dennis Hopper's seminal culture blast, EASY RIDER(1969), and acting in such films as Hopper's, THE LAST MOVIE (1970), and the Roger Corman produced, PSYCH-OUT (1968). In 1971, Jaglom made his first film, A SAFE PLACE, with Orson Welles as actor. They maintained a legendary friendship until Welles death in 1985.
The previous three plaques all honor groups of people. The last plaque to be pictured also honors a group (the Peruvian Air Force), but it is unique in that it also honors a single man.
So, what to expect? I’ll still update the blog from time to time with any interesting news I stumble on, likewise I should be attending the Eurogamer Conference in late-September so be sure to check out my thoughts on any upcoming games I get to play. Finally, assuming Lovefilm send me some actual games rather than countless movies, the occasional review may be posted up – just don’t expect any feedback on brand new releases.
Out my window, my apple tree has gorgeous white blossoms.
When the Van Brunt Street reconstruction and the Gowanus Flushing Tunnel construction are complete, the 80-ft deep area on the west side of Columbia Street is planned to become an open space element of the Brooklyn Waterfront Greenway. It is one of three open space nodes that we are either designing or commencing the community visioning process.
I thank everyone who have supported me to this point and I apologise to those I have hurt.
Light is a green muscle verb striated said the quarks
But then I followed up with, "But what if I'd said that you weren't?" She looked at me, bewildered. I told her, "Not being skinny isn't a bad thing, honey. You know that, right?" She nodded her head, a bit confused, and returned to brushing her hair while gazing at herself. After a few seconds she asked, "But I AM skinny, right?" I didn't answer.
back into my burning throat.
Sprinkles (I used regular multicoloured but you could use pink ones or red ones or whatever).
*Today is Prom day. The house is abuzz!!! B is doing the hair for P and a friend of K's this afternoon. She wanted to make sure HER hair looked stunning and impressive while she was doing their hair. This is what I came up with.
they settle one at a time separately, all together
expanded; you became more concerned about the vision of Our Heavenly Father for
my lips will glorify you.”
Further investigation revealed the Ford F250 truck was reported to the Orlando Police Department as a stolen vehicle.
No, instead of a beautiful girl on each side of his shoulders,
There has been discussion about whether Teardrop Park represents discredited “tower in the park” design. It clearly does not. True, the buildings are not separated from the park by the typical streets and sidewalks. That poses a theoretical problem that the green space might be perceived to “belong” to the buildings, but in execution the design surmounts this problem. Unlike tower in the park design, all the buildings are flush along exterior street lines. Coming up upon the scene there is no indication that the buildings are “within” a park, and except for the entrances, no hint of the park at all. Rather than the park enclosing the buildings (a tower in the park design), the buildings enclose the park. The park is designed as Jane Jacobs indicates she would favor making use of the enclosure of buildings to define the space and gives it definite shape that is “an important event” in its surroundings and doesn’t “ooze” as “no-account leftover.” The park meets other of Jane Jacobs’ prescriptions like having many clear identifiable focal points but Jacobs would have noted the limited light.
Faux fur is a great way to stay warm and beat the winter style slump and with so many options from vests to collars, stoles and shawls its easy to implement faux fur into any outfit.
About Erin: Erin Healy is an award-winning fiction editor who worked with Ted Dekker on more than a dozen of his stories before their collaboration on KISS and BURN. Her new novel NEVER LET YOU GO released in May 2010. She owns WordWright Editorial Services, a consulting firm specializing in fiction book development.
He refused to move.
But while I greatly enjoy food I have feared it equally as much. The fear comes from deeper places of desiring perfection or a “better” figure. But the fear manifests itself in the same thing that I love and am passionate about. It’s strange how that happens… one thing causing both excitement and anxiety.
Bob – Walt I hope had a great Easter weekend and enjoyed watching the Masters, would you have for us today?
Yesterday while I was busy making supper, they were on the floor behind me, building a network of roads that would make the Romans jealous. Tevye had chosen his Lightning McQueen car, and was speeding through the course, making a great deal of racket.
Banknotes as a means of political expression: The revolution did not imply an unanimous vote for the Shah’s overthrow. As much as this revolution involved the participation of millions of people, it also implied the confrontation of differing ideals. These two photographs give recognition to both camps, those who were in favor of the shah, and those who were not. At the height of the revolution, people have instinctively used this means to not only make a statement, but also to clearly signify the radical change in the nature of the ruling power. Here, in the midst of the revolution, banknotes are a simple yet effective way to display one’s position. Together, those two pictures not only depict a means of exchange but also a state of exchange.
And mouth with myriad subtleties
That's great. I'd hate to see you unhappy or uncomfortable.
Wait until that judgment day comes
This land is scary, but exciting. It's a step, and I don't know where it will go. I have my predictions and I'm not setting the bar too high. I'm being realistic. For now, I'm going to lay a blanket in the field of Possibilities and enjoy the sun.
Bigger view….
Manu has said that by diving in water after thrice reciting the Aghamarshana mantras, one reaps the fruits of the final bath in a Horse-sacrifice.”
Pronounced similarly, this batch of rhyming made-up names makes me wish that y’all had been doing less impregnayden and more masturbayden. Guess what? You’re kids will grow up and want to trayden their name for a new one. Oh yeah, I just done and went for it. Now, I realize that I could have enhanced the example by spelling them all with different endings, like Shaedyn, or Gaydin, but when I started writing it out, I threw up in my mouth. If it’s an English name, I should be able to figure out if it’s a boy or a girl.
ready to jam their signals, crash their programs and round them up.
One bloody well near cried.
6. Whole Foods -- Because I normally live in a part of NJ where the closest Whole Foods is 35 minutes south or 40 minutes north and west, I am glad that there are so many Whole Foods stores in the Salt Lake City area. When I'm up in Park City, there's one. There's a store within 10 minutes of my in-laws' house. And, there are a few downtown. So, while they can be expensive on some items (not called "Whole Paycheck" for nothing!), if I use coupons and shop wisely, I can do pretty well on my staples. But, I think I might be spending more time at Sunflower Markets now that I know they are much less expensive on many of those staples.
Lawd, You Made the Night Too Long, Louis Armstrong
“All of them, the people who say I’m racist, they are racist because they say I’m racist,” he added, with a smile.
And yet, we glance. I saw the seemingly large stacks of page layouts they were getting done. The amazing amount of craft and beauty. My pages were much more simple. I worked much more slowly.
That’s a total of 11 inches off my body in four weeks…
Over the past 30 years the first silicon revolution has revolutionized out lives with computers, cell phones, e-mail and digital music.
Lately, school has been pretty intense and it looks like it will remain that way through this semester. Originally I planned on basically closing down the blog until May, but I think for now I will leave it up. I just don't have the time to craft like I would like, but that said I do have projects in the works and things to share. I just won't be able to post quite as often and will have to rely on scheduled posts and older projects I haven't shared. And I also expect that finished projects will be few and far between over the next few months.
I hope I did not bore you to tears and sorry it was all over the place. This is why it took me so long to do an update, my thoughts are just all over the place and major Mommy brain these days!! We are so blessed with our new daughter/sister.
In pot, bring salted water to a boil and cook pasta according to directions. Reserve about a cup of the water for pasta bowl.
I created my own background paper by stamping vintage keys from Papertrey Ink's Lock & Key stamp set then filled in with a few red hearts. I used Text Style over the print and heavily distressed the edges with Color Box Creamy Brown ink. (my new favorite for "strong-arming" my projects ;)
Was there a sadness there? Or was she just bored, sitting there waiting for her mother or her husband. I sometimes have moments like that myself. You stare into the distance and suddenly realise that you've lost twenty minutes. As I was watching her a pigeon landed near her. I guess it had seen some crumbs or something. I hate the fucking things myself - rats with wings.
a) the challenges of providing distance education to primary and secondary schools in rural and remote areas;
Makes 6-7 and will keep for a day or so in an airtight tin. (Muffins are best eaten as fresh as possible.)
A fourth defendant involved in the conspiracy outlined in the indictment has pleaded guilty to related charges, marking the first conviction related to the transmission of obscene spam e-mails.More: ComputerWorld.
MATHEMATICS:
A wealthy man takes revenge on his wife and her lover on her birthday. Clocking in at a mere twelve minutes, with only the slightest pretense of a plot and a poster prominently on display endorsing another of the director’s own films, this one-liner can’t have amused festival organizers. (7/10)
My husband is always making fun of me for liking old people desserts (I like a lot of things with malt, caramel, peanuts, etc.) and this is where it all started. Whenever we go to Nielsen's I without fail order a single chocolate with almond's on top. And without fail my sweet husband makes fun of my choice. Would you like me to get your walker, your teeth, where were you when Lincoln was shot. Yes he is quite the comedian.
Two very minor gripes about an otherwise fascinating and inspiring book:
"Leh - zzshazz -- Hot"!
Deep within my heart…lies a meellll ohh deee
“Chanyeol! You know that I’ll always be by your side. I’ll always be your back up. Please don’t back to the darkness where you used to be.”
BHA is another potentially cancer-causing preservative, but it has been deemed safe by the FDA. Its job is to help prevent spoilage and food poisoning, but it’s a major endocrine disruptor and can seriously mess with your hormones. BHA is in HUNDREDS of foods. It’s also found in food packaging and cosmetics. BHA has many aliases. You can look them up. Or you can follow my advice and DITCH processed foods altogether.
I am a huge Latterman fan. I assume that band was at least a small influence on Bridge and Tunnel. What are some of the band’s other influences? And how would you describe your sound?
For oily skin, try using an oil free primer before applying a matte type foundation that won't clog your pores.Loose powder has fewer oils than pressed powder. Blot the skin periodically throughout the days to remove any shine. Avoid cremes for eye shadow or mascara and creamy style lip pencils.
Working out kind of slipped out of the routine Wednesday and Thursday, and I figured what the heck, why not make the entire week a crap week for me? :o) So instead of the gym we went on a 2.75 mile walk, and hit up the park. It was a beautiful morning and Ryann had so much fun looking for dandies and playing outside. We decided to continue outdoor time when we got home, and I snapped one of my favorite pictures right now. I just love her carrying all her chalk, looking ready to take on the world. During naptime I worked on some more party details. Ryann spent some time playing with the train set Christopher picked up for her birthday. And that night we got to work on the massive amount of tissue poms I wanted hung. Thank goodness for Christopher and my Dad. It only took them about an hour to hang all 90+ poms.
A vicious cycle that anyone who has every struggled with their weight has been on at least once! I did this for three years. Tomorrow is Monday and I can finally say I am not starting a new diet! I am continuing on my path the energy and freedom that I feel is unexplainable. I have finally freed myself from the cycle! Tomorrow I continue on my search.
WINNERS WILL BE ANNOUNCED ON WEBSTER PAGE'S BLOG
There are several reasons why this doesn't work for me; see reasons below:
Great dise?o paginas webs definitely an expert at the job to attend to them. Therefore it makes sense for businesses to invest in hiring professional services for a dise?o paginas web. Knowledge of the target audience and business expectations are important in developing effective dise?o paginas web.Designers help in showcasing the site owner’s ideas in an interesting stle and manner. In no way this means that a difficult or complex design will/needs to/should be provided. Transforming basic concepts into visually fascinating web designs is where the developers creativity comes into play.
Estate agents will hmm and haw about values but for the typical starter-home customer, the arbiter of price is affordability which in turn is a function of earnings. With repayment rates heading for 6% and incomes subject to overall direct tax of 35%, it would seem prudent not to borrow more than three times one’s income. Repayment would thereby absorb about 28% of one’s after-tax income.
So, today I got out there and planted a quince to replace my beautiful, deep pink heather and a dozen chitted potatoes have gone into bags filled with compost. I’ve not quite got the hang of this growing potatoes in bags idea and had a disappointing crop last year, but I’ll persevere and any way it’s good to be out in my garden again, because today it is NOT raining.
Travel delays, plus delays in publishing, the media, and anything related to higher education, the law, or medicine will definitely dog your steps. It's so frustrating! You are a perfectionist. And now these delays make you look ridiculous and inept. (Is there no justice?) Be comforted by the knowledge that every sign is feeling frustrated by delays for some reason or other. It's the nature of the beast. (Mercury retrograde.) Instead, use this time to do research, or finish anything related to higher education, medicine, the media, publishing, and the law. Despite these snafus, you will finish things quite quickly.
Reunion, France
If you’re just starting out, stick with just these books, and only this game system for awhile. There is a temptation to keep buying and playing different rules systems. Not only is this really expensive, but you won’t master the game. Stick with one system until you know it well enough to know it isn’t for you. Of course, if the first night with the system is the worst night of your life, worse than when your spouse left you, then I’ll concede you may want to switch games right there.
Though I won’t tell her!
about her husband dying was so moving, but so depressing, I didn't rush into this one when I got it. But I've heard she actually tells the story of her daughter's death in a less depressing way. I have very high expectations of the book regardless.
Strawberry Swirl Cheesecake
So there you have it. Blue By You is a winner. I'd definitely grab it if you like blues and are somewhere that Sinful is sold.
“The men and women who signed that Declaration of Independence wrote this final phrase: We pledge to each other — we pledge to each other our lives, our fortune, and our sacred honor.”
Here is my wheelbarrow I fill each year with bedding plants, this is whats in it this year, some pansies and last years ones lasted the entire summer they were excellent value for money lol.
the sun takes my hand as to dance
I am afraid it's another quick post, today's card is similar in theme to yesterdays although today I did do some colouring in, just a little black with a fine liner pen, it was more of an experiment to see how it would come out but I was really pleased with the results in the end.
So, yeah--my time off from blogging is done. I've been writing and editing, but after A Month In The Life, I figured you guys deserved A Fortnight Of Silence.
Tincture: Combine 4 oz of fresh yarrow leaf and stalks cut fine (or 2 oz dry powdered herb) with 1 pint of brandy, gin, or vodka in a glass container. The alcohol should be enough to cover the plant parts and have a 50/50 ratio of alcohol to water.
The student council executive elections for next year will take place on Thursday, May 3rd. The position of president is open to students who are in grade 12 next year and the other three executive positions are open to students who will be in grade 11 or 12 next year. Students interested in running, are to submit their names to Mr. Stewart, by 12:00 tomorrow. All students who put forth their names will be interviewed, and those who are deemed capable of taking on the roles, can run for the positions.
(Ok this post is a new one I just couldn’t hold back – my gift to you! ;)
That is not a typo. Take a look at this pea plant. It's nearly 6 feet tall! It finally has blossoms, so we'll see what we get for pea pods in a few weeks.
I think I can sum it all into a tweet I posted a few days ago, which stated:
Yet Thom Hartmann and others remind us that the Supreme Court never ruled in 1886 that corporations were ever given personhood under the 14th amendment (which was originally enacted by Congress to empower slaves) but that an offhanded comment by a Justice was inserted into the ruling later by court reporter J.C. Bancroft Davis, a former railroad president. Therefore, by even a less-than-strict interpretation of the actual ruling, corporations are as much natural persons as oil derricks.
I’m a filthy creature worth of eternal suffering because of my constant failings.
And true smiles and laughter,
If you would like to help please leave a comment or email me at workthatwardrobe@googlemail.com
I let the dough rest for a little while, although it wasn’t strictly necessary. Then I rolled out the dough. Each ravioli gets less than a tablespoon of the filling, and then is sealed up with a little water along the edge of one piece. You will also want to crimp the edges with a fork. You don’t want your filling coming out of the ravioli you worked so hard to make! I find it easier to work with half of the dough at a time. This means that I can work with fewer ravioli at once. Get them filled and roll out the next set. If you wrap the dough in plastic it won’t dry out.
Many of you have heard the saying that "Lemon is my Chocolate". I like chocolate, but lemon is what makes my taste buds very happy. When I think of lemon, I think of a clean and refreshing taste. Plus, I think lemon is one of those universal fruits that makes perks up the flavor in otherwise bland dishes, such as creamed soups and steamed vegetables. My fondness for Greek food is because lemon is found in so many Greek recipes. Our garden has both a Eureka and a Meyer lemon tree. For those of you who aren't familiar with Meyer lemons, they are a hybrid that traces back to Mandarins. The skins are much smoother than the more common Eureka lemon, and the flavor does have a sweet note of mandarin.
Built on desires and communication
From those lyrics, a single image popped into my head: of a boy sitting in a classroom, desperately lonely despite the many students around him, wanting to be ignored. This boy had a secret, I came to see, one so awful that if it were ever made known his otherwise civil classmates would--in a split second--kill him. I pondered what that secret might be. When it came to me, I literally jumped out of my seat: the boy was the only surviving human in a world filled with vampire-like creatures. No existence could be lonelier or scarier than that.
We can best illustrate how life insurance can be viewed as an asset protection product by reviewing the evolution of life insurance products. Initially the death benefit could only be paid out at the death of the insured. Companies then introduced terminal illness riders, which meant that a terminally ill insured could accelerate a portion of the death benefit to either offset some of the costs associated with a terminal illness or to put their own affairs in order.
* An elven warden approaches the PC's and tells them that the ancient seals that guard a terrible evil have weakened
Not only this but also the dubious distinction of being the village with the largest carbon footprint as thousands of watts are used to light these pitches. Perhaps that is why we need a wind-farm just of the coast?
Now I'm off to have a large glass of celebratory wine and propose a toast to all my fellow #NaBloPoMo bloggers wherever you may be (I can start an hour before you lot in the UK because we're an hour ahead in France). Congratulations, we've done it!!!!
The Suncoast Primate Sanctuary in Palm Harbor announced that Cheetah died Dec. 24 of kidney failure.
One group, The Trevor Project, is a resource for LGBTQ youth to reach out to if they are in a situation where they feel there is no way out. I spent a good amount of time on that website, reading about the project and the film that inspired it. The Trevor Project also encourages people who aren't L or G or B or T or Q- but who are allies- to be involved and supportive.
Training is not a skill, it's a worldview. It's not about answering the questions than an unbeliever asks (though those answers are important), but rather it's about thinking through life in a manner that honors God. Training is in righteousness, godliness, not merely in content.
I wince every time I see another black boy’s face on the news, either as a victim of gang violence or as the culprit. Before I even saw Shawn Tyson’s face or heard his name, I just knew in my heart, it was a black boy who had shot those white British boys in Sarasota.
The stars and shapes above are made from an early plastic that is today prized by collectors: Bakelite. The little red key was another hidden treasure; probably part of an old brooch, it will find its way to being repurposed into a piece of my jewelry!
There are a number of online tools available to help you keep track of your health records. Google offers a great one in its arsenal of online applications. It is called Google Health and offers a number of applications for users interested in keeping online records of their health.
2 Tbs Balsamic Vinegar
Naturally, Democrats didn’t go airing the whole truth in such a public forum. They didn’t mention, for example, that Medicare’s claim rejection rate is higher. And they sure as shootin’ didn’t let out that, buried in the thousands of pages nobody read, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act will ultimately benefit WellPoint’s bottom line hugely.
This brush is not super dense but I think that you don't want something super dense when you're just trying to apply a wash of colour to your face. The hairs are really soft and the pick up pigment perfectly. I washed it a few times and it hasn't shed any hairs which is another plus.
Format: Kindle
Marjorie Longo — Professor of Chemical Engineering and Materials Science
picks them up and transports
I'm not a good critic of beer. I figure I can almost always find something to enjoy about a beer. When judging other beer, I try to look for the good as much as the bad.
I wrote a paper in my junior year of college on the virtue of magnanimity. “Great souledness” as my good professor loosely translated it. A “stretching forth of the mind to great things,” according to St. Thomas Aquinas. It surprised and relieved me to discover that this largeness of soul was not just pride…that the longing for great things (not in terms of wealth or power or fame, but that which is truly great) could–should–actually be a virtue. This virtue takes up all things and applies them to the purpose of greatness. That’s the secret of the Little Way of St. Therese, isn’t it? To take up the tiny, the seemingly insignificant, and apply it to that purpose. If one truly lives this virtue, one can never hit the dreaded wall, because the wall is nothing more than the repudiation of magnanimity. Magnanimity takes even the clapboard house, the swimming lessons, and the civic league and turns them outward and upward. One hits the wall when she inverts these things and makes them the destination.
things that look like hairs in them.
Then you turn another corner and all of a sudden you are hit with this wall of sound and people lined up on either side in every available space and in front of you is the giant blue and yellow arch that declares FINISH. Just a side note, to get in the bleachers at the finish you have to have a ticket, and to get within a few blocks of it, people camp out overnight. I'm serious.) So I start to sprint (I can't believe I could sprint still) and make it across the finish line. A line of orange-jacket-clad volunteers cheer me on, and I step aside to pull my phone out of my fuel belt with fumbling fingers (because your fine motor coordination is only working marginally better than your math skills) and turn to take a pic. A nice volunteer asks if I'd like him to take one of me and I probably alarmed him with my effusive thanks.
-Deficiency of calcium may cause neuromuscular excitability, rachitism and alterations in the coagulation of the blood.
El Caminos In The West
- Safe for any type of clothing in any temperature
Hello Mooi Readers, Shoppers & Followers
(End note) During the first thought processes of this article I was doing an EVP recording where I was explaining to our friends on the other side what I was trying to get across in this article and got an outstanding Class A of one word, “Commission” in a loud male whisper. I didn’t take this to mean getting paid for the writing. After looking up some definitions I felt that it more meant: responsibility or charge, assignment, authority granted for a particular action or function, authority to act as agent for another or others, the power thus granted. I don’t know who this wonderful entity was but he strengthened my belief in the miracle of the other side and renewed my passion for life here on the Earth plane.
And yet… I also do think that there is such a thing as “too young,” even if you’re knowledgeable and safe. Call me crazy, but I really don’t want my daughter having sex in high school – or, gods forbid, middle school. Problem is, I’m having trouble coming up with convincing arguments for why that don’t undermine the other points I want to teach…
- If 2x is greater than 100 and x is an integer, how many of the 2x + 2 integers will be divisible by 3 and also by 2?
There's nothing on earth quite as sweet and lovely as a newborn baby. With that said, I'd like to introduce you to Lily. Not my Lily, but another precious little Lily. She was born April 5, weighing in at 8 lbs. 10 oz. Her sweet Mama is the daughter of a friend of mine, and she actually used to babysit my kids. Boy, does that ever make me feel old.
More than 3 cats requires a kennel license.
“I was told ‘We cannot help you if we don’t have your name’. It wasn’t about helping me, but helping to ensure that the city’s vehicles are not abused,” she said.
If the dossier arrives today then we have a few hours to put it together with translations, make three photo copies of every page (with translations, medical lab reports, 3 years of tax returns, authentications and legalizations that's probably going to be 100 pages in the original copy.) Then it will fly Fed Ex next day air to arrive at the home of a family traveling on Saturday morning. Allowing ONE day (Monday) to sneak this thing in under the May 1st cutoff.
Could she quaff
After his years with intelligent but conventional Katherine, Henry had found Anne, whose young womanhood had been shaped by confident women unafraid to speak their minds about virtually any subject to be an intellectually and erotically stimulating challenge. But the court was still very much a boy’s club, in which Henry had delighted in surprising Katherine by showing up in her bedroom, one morning, with 12 of his hyper-active companions, dressed like Robin Hood and his Merry Men. “The queen,” Hall reports, “the ladies and all other there were abashed, as well for the strange sight, as also for their sudden coming.”[1] Blushing bride, boisterous husband; it was just the way it was supposed to be. But Anne was not a blusher. Spontaneous and intense in an era when women were supposed to silently provide a pleasing backdrop for men’s adventures, Anne had never “stayed in her place”— which was exciting in a mistress, but a PR problem in a wife. Even if Henry’s own fascination with Anne had remained unwavering (which it probably did not; after such long, unrealized pursuit, even the most enchanting woman would have to seem a little too “real”) her involvement (read: interference) in the political and religious struggles of the day was a continual annoyance to her enemies, who saw her as the mastermind behind every evil that properly should have been laid at Henry’s feet, from the destruction of Wolsey and More to the harsh treatment of Katherine and Mary.
This was still a few years before questioning her authority was an option. So, as an already obsessive movie geek, I was heartbroken. There it was, the mother of all movies, the cinematic Holy Grail, playing at the Southgate theater only five miles away, rendered forbidden fruit by my mother. Sure, I knew the whole story of the movie already, enthusiastically told to me by friends whose parents had no objections to letting them see it. But I wanted to see it myself. With Jaws rendered off limits, it became the only movie I wanted to see. And in ensuing months, I would occasionally ask Mom again, hoping she’d change her mind, but was always met with a stern no. She’d offer pretty-much the same reason every time: “That’s not the kind of movie a kid should see.”
We have buttons for everyone on our sidebar - please take the one that applies to you ! CONGRATULATIONS !!
Jerome: But all these things are full of mysteries; the Lord does these things not in the morning, nor at noon, but in the evening, when the Sun of righteousness was set.
I don’t always have good days. The past few days have been not-so-great, and I haven’t been treating my body in a loving way. Let me tell you, I sure can feel the difference. But the amazing thing is, this is a day-by-day, hour-to-hour endeavour. I don’t need to be perfect in loving my body. I just need to do my best.
Another friend called that same day. Encouraging me with God's word to stay strong in the promises God has given me.
"Chronic pain fits the definition of a disease," she said.
At least the imp now has a slide.
Like I said, I'm not complaining. There's a constant supply of fresh towels, somebody comes and cleans up after me while I'm out, and if I use the pool around dinner hour I have it to myself. The scrambled eggs at the breakfast buffet may be a little cold and undercooked, but they're on the company.
And so it is written- and it has been spoken for many centuries before it was written- that those who do the Will of God shall be called the children of God. Who would know God’s Will so perfectly to be able to identify those who do God’s will and then to call them the children of God?
So here's my card.....
Carry on kidding yourself.
Fold edges of dough over apple filling, crimp edge slightly. Dot with butter.
But maybe he’ll be kinder if he knows,
St. Louis managed to move closer to Atlanta yesterday with a close 3-2 win over the rival Cubs. Octavio Dotel picked up the win in relief of starter Edwin Jackson, and the Cardinals scored two runs late on home runs by Yadier Molina and Rafael Furcal. The Cards will be on the road in Houston to end the season, and they have a very good chance to overtake the struggling Braves.
as it freaks me out. Fortunately, Mr.4444 is a talented (and brave) cook
The marker was not hard to find again. A bird, full of bright plumage, rested upon the arm of the small skeleton. The bird preened itself, squawked down at William, then flew off deeper into the jungle following the skeletal direction. Sergeant William looked back to the river. Now I have a proper guide, he thought, and followed after the bird.
For those of you that didn’t react at all to the last half of that sentence, let me clarify something for you. The German autobahn is the highway system of Germany. There is no speed limit in most sections and German-built cars are very fast.
Congrats winners! Email contests@vervestamps.com to claim your $25 gift certificate. I'll be out of the office until Wednesday, so I'll respond when I return! Thanks!
Now all I need is a pin back and It will be done (that's why there's still a thread hanging - I thought of cutting it off for the picture, but then I'd just have to start a new one to finish the piece.)
I did hear of him, though. In March 2002, I spied an announcement in Locus magazine, which covers the world of speculative fiction (the announcement doesn't survive online, but it's memorialized in Locus's March 2002 Table of Contents). The grand prize in the prestigious third annual Delmont-Ross Writing Contest, sponsored by the Delmont-Ross Foundation, Merrill Lynch Trustees, and Borders Books, had been awarded to Mitchell Gross, writing as Mitchell Graham, for his fantasy novel The Fifth Ring, which had subsequently been picked up by major SF/fantasy publisher Eos in a three-book deal. Gross, described as "a practicing trial lawyer and neuropsychologist, a former member of the men's US Olympic Fencing Team," reportedly received "the highest scores in the contest's history" from a ten-member jury panel headed by renowned SF writer Ben Bova.
...The main religious argument is an inclusion/exclusion argument — i.e., we should not deny two men or two women who love each other the privilege of marriage because to do so is judgmental and restrictive..." I think the religious argument is "how can the modern Church redefine something that Jesus and the Apostles understood to be between one man and one woman?" The moral argument is "inclusion/exclusion" based on the human experience of love between two persons. How we formulate our moral arguments about the appropriateness of all types of sexual behaviors as well as same sex attraction is a serious question for all Christians and is not something that can be changed by petition..
South east of the Swiss are the Italians. The Italians make fabulous sexy, desirable clothes and cars. The Italians are all about image. Italy is full of pretty hillside villages full of elderly people sweeping their doorsteps and watching tourists walk by. Italy is also a huge tourist destination but I believe that if you took away all the American and Irish Catholics visiting the Vatican those numbers would reduce dramatically. The next largest number of visitors would be English people visiting their house in Umbria or Villa in Tuscany and knowing how they are all much more terribly civilised than those ghastly people who holiday in Spain.
2). 28mm Vikings for Saga
There followed a week of frantic activity to get the cottage tidy and presentable for estate agents to value it. I would not describe the inside of the cottage as untidy, but it was amazing the amount of clutter that there was around the place. What did not have a home and could not be thrown away ended up in the spare bedroom which is the only room that has not been decorated. Things were stuffed into drawers and cupboards and afterwards I did not know where I had put them! The dust sheets that had protected the conservatory furniture were bundled into a bin bag which I hid in the garage. Luckily I remembered that hiding place and they did not end up going out with the rubbish.
Anyone that saw Britain’s Got Talent last night, would have seen little Malaki Paul break down in tears, in the middle of his rendition of Listen by Beyoncé.
McIntosh, Peggy. (1988). White Privilege: Unpacking the Invisible Backpack.Retrieved January 23, 2012 from Seattle Pacific University Blackboard.
More and more Americans are becoming painfully aware that their medical bills, taxes and health insurance premiums are going up because, today, 1 in 6 highly vaccinated child in America is learning disabled; 1 in 9 has asthma; 1 in 100 develops autism; 1 in 450 becomes diabetic and 7 in 1,000 babies born alive are dying before their first birthday. 24 25 With 69 doses of 16 vaccines being given to children from birth through age 18 26 and hundreds of new vaccines being developed 27 to prevent infectious disease while trillions of dollars are being spent to treat chronic disease, 28 is it any wonder more parents are asking more questions about vaccine safety?
For the fridge, I wanted to do the freezer on bottom to mimic our real fridge and I love the retro look of it. It is a simple box, with routering on the top, side and bottom. I think it really came to life when I got it painted and added the handles. Totally retro and cute!
Meetings, Major Church: Gatherings of church members for their edification and instruction. Larger church meetings, such as general conference, are televised so that members can sleep in the comfort of their own homes.
You may not have control over the language Clitoraid uses but you certainly have control over who you chose to partner with. Indeed your decision to partner with Clitoraid through Dr. Dodson is both implied and EXPRESSED support of their work. Your customers have certainly seen it that way.
If you never played a Silent Hill game start with either 1 or 2.
I’m not an addict of the Archers and the programme and the characters annoy and amuse me in less than equal measures. Yet as a writer, I love playing the “predict-the-plot” game and musing on what is being set up for future episodes.
There is always the UN, International Criminal Court and Interpol or some EU apparatus if the French government is inadequate. The Rakyat might fight to protect PM Najib, if PM Najib will grant with that mandate :
Hope you like them...
We reached the inn just enough time to get freshen up for our dinner at a little fancy restaurant called John Ash and Co, which happens to be housed inside the compound.
” I have the right to create my own space, and create my community”
Thank you for letting us back inside.
Rodiogal also claimed that I insulted Elizabeth Warren by calling her a "carpetbagger". Umm, look it up, I think Warren's pic is right there next to the definition.
Me: What is that
The Sentencing Project is a national non-profit organization engaged in research and advocacy on criminal justice policy. See the DOJ report (pdf), which notes that: "Local jails admitted an estimated 11.8 million persons during the 12 months ending midyear 2011, down from 12.9 million persons admitted during the same period in 2010 and 13.6 million in 2008. The number of persons admitted in 2011 was about 16 times the size of the inmate population (735,601) at midyear 2011."
I listened to this novel on audio. It was produced by recorded books and read by John Keating. It consisted of 7 CDs and ran for about 7.75 hrs. The narration at first seems a little slow, but as I adapted to it overtime I really began to enjoy it. Keating’s narration and the audio production is clear and free of flaws, which makes for an enjoyable listening experience.
I got the earrings at a vintage fair. Both them and the cuff are stamped "Renoir."
The case in U.S. District Court, Northern District of California is Apple Inc v. Samsung Electronics Co Ltd et al, 11-1846.
Church was wonderful. The food and conversations were great. And we all enjoyed a relaxing evening with amazing company! Oh and how could I forget to mention the dessert, coconut cake, and chocolate turtle cake just to name a few! I am pretty certain I went into a sugar induced comma after dinner!
In simpler terms, if you take the time to look for behavioral issues and do something about them, you can directly influence your crash rates. Similarly, if you ignore behaviors deemed to be “low priority” such as failing to use turn signals, these habits can develop into an increasing role in crash involvement.
- I remember.said the Dutchess with a smile on her face...we ate a Shepard's pie..Mr C made it....wasn;t that a sweet thing to do...
I know that diamonds
Now my friend does quite a few other things (she’s a Kiwi – they are great mutli-taskers and like DIY), she also writes – Fibonacci x 2.
___ several errors, e.g. “Set in , this book tells the story of a serial killer and his murderous rampage through this sleepy country town”? I scrolled down to see who had released this and read “Publisher: Press”.
Air France animal fee: $150
The mental block I've had lately has become an enormous time sucker, causing me to spend hours searching Google for absolutely nothing in particular and then wondering where my entire night has gone. Granted, I can also blame a little of that on the constant stream of Law & Order: SVU episodes we have DVR'd. But honestly, I've just felt like I have had nothing noteworthy to write about. For example, the recent topics I considered blogging about (but ended up staring at Elliott Stabler instead) are as follows:
I cannot promise an exact turnaround time but if you need the reviews posted in a certain time frame please let me know.
Never would I have thought that shopping for a fish and getting it home would be like getting the ring back to Mordor.
These are basically just 4AM ramblings that I hope will stand out for someone. It’s a culminations of thoughts that have been laid on my mind and heart, and new things I’m learning every day in my walk. I say all this as someone still learning these lessons everyday. My walk is by no means perfect, but I’m tried of being lukewarm. I’m ready to go all in, and I encourage you to do the same. To sum it all up: we are not of this world. We will never truly belong in this world because we were not made for here. We are called to a greater purpose, and a greater plan than we can imagine. It’s just all about making the decision to leave yourself and this world behind, and going all in for Jesus.
Worse luck for the Confederate Army appeared at Pittsburg Landing on the evening of April 6. Reinforcements underGeneral Don Carlos Buell arrived. Beauregard had been forewarned at the possibility of Buell’s arrival, but he decided to accept the report that the Union commander was on his way to Decatur, Alabama. By the morning of April 7, Beauregard had no idea that his forces were outnumbered by both Grant and Buell’s forces. As he prepared to finish Grant by the banks of the Tennessee River, Beauregard and his men found themselves surprised by a strong counterattack by the Union Army.
Can you tell from the photo above that I am collecting ephemera
9) Add the sweet potatoes and simmer for another 30 minutes.
FLC welcomes essays from current or recent students enrolled in adult basic education, GED, adult literacy or family literacy programs located in Florida. Please limit to one submission per adult learner.
But wishing doesn’t seem like it’s nearly enough.
They are now — one way or another — virtually all giving aid to or investing in Africa, whereas Africa, with its vast savannahs and its lush pastures, is giving almost nothing to anyone, apart from AIDS.
A new chip may allow phones to see through walls. It will be useful in avoiding studs when you throw your phone through the wall after not being able to complete any calls.
But this I know with all my heart
The champion stepped in and held up the belt. The crowd cheered. He called for a microphone. The challenger snatched it. Taking it to his lips he said with conviction, “I’m trying to fight the good fight!” He pointed to the crowd. “NC!”
2 tablespoons freshly squeezed lemon juice
Kambale Musavuli -
If you have perpendicular seams, make sure to finish all of the seams traveling in the same direction before sewing up any cross seams. For instance, each lengthwise skirt seam should be bound before the skirt gets stitched to the bodice along the waist seam.
The layers behind the circle mats were used CB 5x7 Polka Dots embossing folder and EK Success Diamond Lace edger punch. To finish off, the card was embellished with the pleated ribbon and rhinestones.
I am delighted you have stopped by for a visit today. Your presence always make my tea party that much more special! Do you have a favourite teacup/teapot or mug that you would like to share with us today? I would love to see it and I'm sure others would too!
5. Unforgiveness comes when personal trust has been violated.
The invites feature an adorable Mario in a tux, standing with his princess outside the correct castle. Even the cards to indicate whether guests want beef or veggies are 8-bit (although there’s no option to add mushrooms).
The colors in the cards (done as oil paintings) are magical! The symbolism is non-traditional, but entirely representative of the energy of the card. While perhaps this deck could not be used for class use (where the deck of choice is generally the Rider-Waite), it could be used to learn the Tarot by studying the LWB (Little White Book, Companion Book). The research behind this deck is phenomenal! My advise – go buy every single book in the bibliography! Now!
Despite the minor niggles, I would certainly recommend the book, although the subject matters means that it might not appeal to everybody. I will also be looking out for other books by this author.
4. Most Beautiful- I just don’t understand. Now I have to go searching through them all to find one that is pretty. Be right back……Ok, I don’t write beautiful blogs. I have one with a skunk, two with stupid ex husbands, and this one Well, That’s a Nice Gesture
Abdullah’s position on Palestine is a strange reason to cut links. Cameron will have to understand that very many Muslims here in Britain support the killing machine Hamas. There is one particular distinction politicians need to understand. That is, many Muslims believe in terrorism against the Israelis but not terrorism at home. They couldn’t believe in that; could they? Muslims would hardly get away with saying that they think that terrorism on their own soil is legitimate. That would result in political suicide. And many Muslims are far too clever for that. Let the official loonies, the Bad Muslim Cops, like Islam4UK, Muslim Against Crusades and Hizb ut-Tahrir, hint at the legitimacy of home-grown terrorism. Many of the Good Muslim Cops believe that too. Of course they do not say it. Well, they don’t say it to the Birmingham Mail or on Question Time. Whether they say it in private or not, I will leave it to the reader to decide.
“Pavlov”, situated right next to the Nieuwe Kerk where Spinoza lies buried, used to be my favourite spot for a soft drink or coffee and a quiet read. The terrace is beautiful, with big trees and a view of the church. But after two recent visits, it seemed not only Spinoza lay buried, but “Pavlov’s” service as well.
This supporting cast is more vocal in some people than in others. It is the type of thing usually sorted out in childhood, with imaginary friends being a key to future results. Imaginary friends are little more than imaginary bodies to hold the very real voices inside a persons head. Always being personally comfortably with the voices in my head I never needed imaginary friends.
They are giving the winner a $10 gift certificate!
But then I spotted him. His shadow more visible than his battered frame against the backdrop of the terrace wall.
Squid-ink linguine paired with oil cured cod
Unfortunately, I did not live this verse at various times in my life. No, I was not a difficult child, but on the inside, the thoughts I had towards my parents were not always good. Eventually, under the right circumstance, the thoughts became words that came out of my mouth about them. Those words were not honoring.
– Very well, I’ll do it myself then. Off you trot, and be discrete about it, for heaven’s sake.
Forever changing
Thanks so much for stopping by, have a great day, and HAPPY ANNIVERSARY to Tiddly Inks!
28 girls and their families were served through the Dream Home, STAR House, and Bridge Project
Boyfriend: "Well, first I would want to get more information. Are you talking about a fetus or embryo inside a uterus or an actual baby uterus? Or a baby's uterus?
in the window
This beast is the pro touch for any good heavy track you have heard in the last 10 years.
and online at:
That leaves the Paddick vote as critical - in 2008, Paddick's supporters voted strongly (about two to one if memory serves) for Boris Johnson over Ken Livingstone but, despite the presence of Liberal Democrats in Coalition with the Conservatives, this time it's far less clear. IF it's nearer to 50/50 or possibly even 55/45 for Livingstone, Boris will lose and the political ramifications of that will be enormous (as indeed they will be if he wins).
8. Pigmeat
What we saw was so incredible and so vast, and we got quite low and near to the rocks (or so it felt) which I'm not sure Jonathan was too keen on. He looked a bit peaky at this point!
Data are everywhere. And talk about data - big, open, mined, as an asset, as something to protect - is going to be everywhere in 2012. Here's the New York Times on Big Data. Here are five trends that will shape data. Here is an example of Big Data for Good. You can even get a Big Data t-shirt (HT @tkb)
Another useful sleight of hand in Downfall’s incomplete account of the perjury trial is the glaring contradiction between McCombes’s insistence that he confronted Sheridan over his visit to Cupids in 2001 and the Crown, the police and other witnesses placing the event as having taken place in September 2002.
Nirvana The man who sold the world US
Once the six SUPP reps join the BN club, Taib has the majority seats (parti Bumiputra + BN club = 36 seats), he can easily put Awang Tengah as the Deputy CM 2.
Please come follow me to my new adventure...
After her search about the shop, Lily Beth sits on the shop's back porch and enjoys her sticky bun and coffee. At 9:00 A.M. she puts on a record to fill the void with music and opens the shop for customers. Her shift ends at 1:00 P.M. At 1:10 P.M. she is out on the pavement waiting for Mr. Pringle. The rest of the day is spent with her friends, her cats and her garden.
Pangaea starts to break apart over the next 60 million years. The great plain of North America is a giant inland ocean.
I've bought several packs and jumbos of the 2012 Topps over the past few weeks, but out of the goodness of my heart (and to encourage my 13-year-old son to collect) I've let him keep all the Cardinals and I take the duplicates.
But if I owe you money, Mama, get in line..
DIVORCE – I never ever thought I would get a divorce. And if I ever did, I would never marry again. Well, I did get divorced and it was the best thing that could have happened. I will say, though, when I thought about it, I felt like I was letting God down. I felt like I lied to Him. I know now that He would never had wanted me to stay in that situation. I have also decided (come to terms) that I do not need to remarry.
Heidi and I began to laugh and she said, “There she was sitting in her old pickup wearing overalls and drinking beer. I don’t think she got out of North Carolina in time.”
IRON MAN grins, turns his back to THOR and whistles “If I Had A Hammer”. THOR doesn’t get it. HAWKEYE and BLACK WIDOW smirk to give them something to do.
After spending days walking through some of the most beautiful nature I’d ever seen, I found the big city to be boring, ugly and monotonous.
The rest of the world deals with our face on a daily basis, but we chose to ignore it.
Presents I at first found
I love this jewelry organizer. Almost as much as I love T.J.Maxx, the provider of said jewelry organizer.
referred to in Revelation in correlation with the Lake of Fire, which I take as ultimate spiritual death. Jesus can promise this to Overcomers because, as the introduction to the letter reminds us, He has supreme authority over death. He conquered it! He can give life; He can save from death.
all of
As a new year comes and an old one goes, it's time to look forward to what will be in 2011. The age-old tradition of making resolutions coincides with the changing of years. In fitting with this tradition, I'd like to make a New Year's resolution to try to cook/bake new things in the kitchen. This year I will be turning 25, a quarter of a century old! And for my resolution/bucket list of 2011, I will be making a 25 by 25 Bucketlist Challenge. Time to get started on building my cooking repertoire.
Saskia ruffles her mum’s hair.
In the future, I hope to feature some other releases by African-American folk singers (I know, technically Washington is African-Caribbean-Canadian) like Leon Bibb and Casey Anderson. Next post, however, will be some cool late-60's pop music from Bill Tinker.
So last session I rolled to see if the pirates had returned to discover the theft (they hadn't). Then I decided we better get prepared for pirates anyway and had the players roll on the hireling traits table to see what the three most famous pirates around were like. We ended up with Il Castrato (teenager with birthmark on nose lack of appetite for sex), Campanillo (powerfully strong local from Nidus with belled legs), and Suicide Jack (dermal decorations on his legs, stupid but cruel).
James Morey asked many questions in a previous conversation. They are all important questions, if someone is honestly seeking answers. We have seen in the past that many are not seeking answers, but seek an argument. There is a difference. While we all love to banter here I thought it would be fitting to answer these questions as a post.
One of only two survivors of a plane crash, Nell Slattery wakes in the hospital with no memory of the horrific experience-or who she is, or was. Now she must piece together both body and mind, with the help of family and friends, who have their own agendas. She filters through photos, art, music, and stories, hoping something will jog her memory, and soon, in tiny bits and pieces, Nell starts remembering. . . .
Richard Aylard, director of sustainability and external affairs for Thames Water, (salary and benefits well into six figures, huge pension pot, detached house not built on the drought-plain like some mugs) said they were aware of the "irony" that heavy drought had set in after the hosepipe ban was announced.
And the woman that started all the fun - hehehe.
Time for the first real rewrite/edit. Good news? I still love my characters and the stories I’ve written. Bad news? As I learn and grow as a writer I find myself back in the orginal mss looking to clean them up.
Angel Baltar: “You know it doesn’t like that name. (Six gives him a look) Silly me. Silly. Silly me. “
I promised I would behave: not jump the barriers, goose his bodyguards, tug at his ponytail, steal his Mantilla fan, request a free Chanel 2.55 bag. This was a big ask, in particular since I was only gagging to get the skinny (no pun intended) on how he allegedly lost ninety pounds on a regime of Diet Coke and steamed veggies; not to mention his random tweets, that cameo in Zoolander and rumours about him being cryogenically frozen. I had a lot to say but I would remain shtum. Discretion thy name is…
The self extends into the world step by step, and we can withdraw it along the same route in reverse. The withdrawal begins with all of the physical activities we perform with our senses. “Sacrificing these into the mind” means stopping all those activities and giving their energy to the mind. Next, we take all the contemplations, opinions, and desires of the mind and grind them all to a halt. The energy released by halting the ever-wandering mind is then placed into our life’s breath. Then we push the life’s breath downward, allowing death to begin taking claim of our body. When death claims the body, it recycles it by breaking it down into the chemical components that form it. There are five categories of components: called earth (solids), water (liquids), fire (energies), air (gasses), and ether (space).
I don’t know whether this rumor is true or not, although I wouldn’t exactly be shocked to learn that the Vatican is invested in a major arms dealer. All I know is that this picture says a lot for itself:
MH: Bitter Seeds centers around your version of the World War II or more specifically the conflicts between Nazi Germany and Britain. Did you ever worry that creating a story involving Nazi Superhero like people would be seen in a bad light?
Hélène Boudreau is the author of REAL MERMAIDS DON’T WEAR TOE RINGS. She’s never spotted a real mermaid in the wild but the writer in her thinks they are just as plausible as seahorses, flying fish and electric eels.
Why do we not see such generous media coverage when people go out onto the street to protest the many injustices in this country? Why does Aziz not rush to meet protesters outside the palace promising swift action for inequality and corruption instead of sending his thugs to greet them with tear gas and beatings?
Experienced consultancy practitioners who have worked and studied situations are successful solopreneurs. Their ability to promote their product of knowledge and experience can be through word-of-mouth or the many network and web sites available to all.
Back to Madison Street …
After this next weekend, though, I think I will finally be able to let these poor guys rest at my mother’s- because my guy is scared to death of them….particularly the roaches I also have.
And in the last analysis that is the reason that a “no” position is being adopted here: if we do need a bailout at the end of 2013 and there is no other lender in prospect, then we simply hold a second referendum. It’s not as if we’re not used to such phenomena!
Many times I’ve counted down wrongly.
The Chaplain and MO.
Truth then becomes the enemy of progress. The enemy of the state. The enemy of the people.
Something I am very pleased about this year is my sucess at growing Watercress "Aqua" - never tried this before as I thought it needed clean flowing water ( like the watercress beds in Hertfordshire near where I grew up as a child) but no! you CAN grow it in a pot! and it is lovely!
In the first stage the aim is to cause the targeted person’s body to undergo an emergency immune response. And the person is experiencing fear but does not realize it. They may only feel hot because they have no information about danger and what they do have is subconscious because the people who pose the danger are only relationally entangled with the victim and not any closer in relationship. Just enough danger is posed to make the person insightful so that they will perceive what is being presented. However as the images will be revolting or extremely distasteful most people will shun them almost immediately and try to avoid them, which means the ideas become unconscious very quickly. However that does not help the person because those ideas are still in mind and may still be operative. This only requires a general statement, which if accepted effectively makes those ideas relevant. Thus as I have shown in the illustration above, if the woman is frying something and it can be seen from a distance or even only heard by the people who set up “the game”, then her actions can serve for both the revolting idea and the general statement/suggestive idea. “What is getting fried” may sound like a question but it can be used as two phrases. First phrase “what is” can then we indicating an image and in this case it is one of her brain. And note too that “what is” can also serve as a suggestion of something as being real. And the other phrase “getting fried” then is used to relate to the first phrase. So what sounds like a question to her and may pass as a question is not a question. Even more simply a suggestion of “it is being fried” is likely to be accepted without question, without doubt of it even being their own thought. What is “it”? The suggestion is general! Accepting this suggestion means the person has effectively opened the door to harm because they are accepting ideas, some of which are unconscious, in mind as valid. And ideas act as directives to the body. Incredible as it may seem but the body does not question the matter. If there are thoughts such as this in mind the immune system will immediately swing into action. The aim, which is to ignite the immune system to react to perceived damage in the brain, is accomplished once the woman accepts these ideas in mind. Thus blood and blood/immune fluids will build-up as the first stage of a repair job. This may affect a major artery and/or an area of the brain and a lot depends on the imagery and ideas in mind. This part of the process is what they, i.e., the evil people (evil mob) call “creating plugs”.
"Sorry, you're losing me again."
Crib-noted gloves
I've never been more certain.
And does beseech I make it whole,
The text translation can be found here, which might be helpful to review before the performance if you are unfamiliar with the work.
Over the next few days it was all just doing tests and ultrasounds and xrays to try and find out what was making him so sick.
And synchronistically…I write in this post about the devil in me just as I read a response to my email announcement of this blog—someone recalling the Metro North ride along the Hudson to Westchester County and pointing out that it passes the Bronx stop at Spuyten Duyvil, a Dutch name I’ve seen variously interpreted as “spinning devil” or “spitting devil.”
I should be getting ready to step into a classroom this school year. Nervous and giddy with all the energy of a new teacher. But I'm not. I get to hear about all my school friends and their new classes and the teachers they are working with. I will be absolutely ecstatic for them. I still know that it was the right thing to do. For my sanity, for my health, for my children. But, I don't know if it was right for my heart. I don't know if it is still the depression that creeps in. Or if the break has given me too much time to think now. I don't know what is wrong exactly.
We woke up the following morning to such a beautiful Hawaiian breeze, oh how I miss that breeze! Her windows were open, there was no need for AC. We decided to take a walk to the beach. It was only a five minute walk, well probably a two minute walk. The base is right on Ewa Beach (Pronounced “Eva”). There weren’t so many people there. Perfect. Anyone could enjoy the beautiful scenery, I could see downtown Honolulu and Diamond Head Crater to my left- a glimpse of some things I would see later on.
George Howard, 45, Hicksville, N.Y.
So to shift the fat, shift the stress. Take a note book and pen and make that journey easy for yourself. Make an action plan, go on , now: do it.
On Saturday evening and through Sunday the truth of this statement became evident. People were wanting to pray.
The Riftwar Saga was my first foray into fantasy and while I’ve read many others, the characters stay with me still, and I still get teary-eyed when a favourite character dies even though I’ve read the books enough times to quote not just lines but whole paragraphs.
I managed to hit a couple of estate sales this weekend and found this children's chair.
My hands couldn’t find the door frame no matter how much I searched blindly. I didn’t want to take my eyes off of the dozen fighters slugging the hell out of each other.
Thanks to everyone who's downloaded these shows, and posted their appreciation. I hope you've enjoyed the music. Take care.
In the church’s attic, there are about 20 elements that was re-used during the renovation in the 1800s. On the upper part of the staves you can see wood carvings of the old norse gods. To me this is very interesting and it shows that although the Norwegians were forced to worship the new god from the Middle East, they secretly continued to pray to their old Norse Gods. Unfortunately this part of the church is not accessible for the public because of security and the difficult access.
*Depends on how much we like this one.
Just after I posted yesterday's blog the phone in our room rang. It was the front desk saying they didn't recognize the website/agency we'd used to book the room and we'd need to charge it again separately... at 10:00pm. So though I was still okay, poor Jim was woken back up and then couldn't get back to sleep (couldn't turn his brain off) and ended up writing emails to the agency and looking into how to dispute charges and everything else for another hour. So while we liked the hotel overall, we were a little disappointed with the late call. Could they not have said something earlier when we stopped by the front desk? The good news is that we heard back from the agency today and it sounds like there was a staff change at the hotel or something and it's being resolved. Since our card was charged twice it seems that they'll use the second room charge for when we stay there again when we're back to Cuzco on Thursday.
T. Time you wake up: All the time these days, with baby around. My ideal time for work would be 6-6:30AM although before he came along I got up at 7:30.
Actually I'm sure I've heard various experts say things to the effect that you can't make things any better at this point, but you can absolutely make them worse. So in the interest of avoiding injury and tired legs, I am resisting my impulse to over-exercise and just keeping it light. I've even (pretty much) convinced myself to take two full rest days before the marathon, instead of sneaking off to the Y on Friday morning for a final shot at the elliptical. I think. Okay, I'm not completely firm on that but I am leaning toward not going. I'll probably be doing my last minute packing then anyway.
Doesn’t look like much of a pro football player, does he? That’s what most of the tired old dopes that steal a paycheck as pro football scouts thought, at least. This measly little guy lucked out and got selected waaaaay back in round six, the 199th overall pick in the 2000 draft. Maybe you’d recognize him more easily with the three SuperBowl rings he won before age 28. It’s Tom Brady.
Up until this year, I figured that if someone had an STI, they would divulge that before we got sexually active. After all, I would. When I was 20, I contracted chlamydia through unprotected sex. It was caught during a normal checkup, thankfully, and I was treated. Even while on the antibiotics, when I would no longer be contagious, I told a new lover that I was being treated for it.
e-mail: adonaldson@desnews.com
Because you get so much time to ponder in the holidays you have lots of time to dream and ‘plan’ for the future. It’s everything you want to happen, but you know you won’t do it in real life. I can’t tell you how many times I have told her I love her and how many times she’s told me before I could. The main problem about doing that in real life, is that I can’t really do anything when I’m around her. I never remember how you’re supposed to act, so I always forget a plan that I was going to carry out, or a hint that I had thought of beforehand. The only thing I can do is remind myself to just keep quiet and stay controlled. On one practice she even told me to relax as I was getting to hyped up. That’s obviously a definite point against me and not something attractive. Thank goodness she doesn’t really seem to mind.
Thanks for all the applications to be part of our design team here at Cardmadfairy's Digi Days, we are trying really hard to narrow it down to our top 2 and will be making a decision and contacting our favourites at the weekend :o)
This is about as different from the Caley Sample Room as you can get but that doesn't detract from the fact that it's still a great place - a more traditional, old fashioned pub with large painted glass windows with the McEwan's logo, a wrap-around 3/4 style bar, small tables with enough room for a pint and a newspaper (and that's about it) and a great floor - partially wooden, partially chequer-tiled. I remember going here after a rugby game and having to drink Caledonian 80/-, just because everyone else was, but now it's Stewart Brewing that have their Diggers 80/- on a couple of the taps. Also available were Broughton Clipper IPA, their Coulsons EPA, and Caledonian Flying Scotsman and their 2point8. Since I'd had the Adnams 'lite' beer earlier in the afternoon I though I'd try the 2point8, especially since the beer miles involved from the brewery would have been minimal, but it wasn't too good, a bit bland and there was definitely some diactyl kicking about at the end.
Stearamine Oxide – See Stearyl Alcohol.
She is seventeen on the 17th of June.
3) Have something great to say, and don’t just say it, show you care – if it’s in the usefulness of your information (which admittedly this one post isn’t really that useful) , or it’s in the engagement of your audience. (In this case, my audience is anyone who actually likes what I write or draw or sing about or eat! )
Catch you again tomorrow.
The real leader is not the manager, entrepreneur, pioneer, knowledge geek, or “higher-up”. Position or leverage may help, but just. Influence will ensure you are in for the long haul.
- Size: 12.2″ x 10.2″ x 3.9″,W31 x H26 x D10cm
If you get multiple similar questions on your page, you may want to write a general status update that addresses it, link to where you posted about it on your blog rather than going to each individual question. You don't want audience to feel like you aren't paying attention to them, so answer it one way or the other.
It is this silent harmony that makes us a couple. This peaceful traditions that we have built our relationship on.
While seated at the bar in the Schooner, a Manhattan Beach watering hole, he raised his right leg and swung it like a pendulum demonstrating a knee that appeared to have no tendons supporting it. He estimated that during his rodeo career he had busted about 42 bones in competition and “cracked a couple more in brawls.”
My mom had parts of her intestines removed due to cancer and has multiple myloma (in remission, currently).
Add to these the Ohio/Kentucky specialty goetta. Like the others, it’s an immigrant dish. Although sometimes made with beef rather than pork, goetta is essentially scrapple made with steel-cut oats in the place of scrapple’s buckwheat. Its name is a transliteration into English of the Plattdeutsch (Low German) götta, meaning groats (i.e., hulled, cracked grains). In standard High German, the word is Grütze, a cognate our own Southern grits. In fact, my great grandmother’s name for sliceable puddings such as scrapple was Happelgritz. Happel is an old dialect word for “head” suggesting that her recipe was made from pork head — a very common practice.
I then progressed it to 2 weeks of “2 days on-1 day off.” It’s pretty self explanatory-I would work out 2 days in a row, then an off day and repeat-this increased the number of workout day from 3 to 5.
‘If you two have got a minute …’ Ollie interrupted, ‘Amy told me something.’
Behavioural issues relating to his being a child-man; friendships with chimpanzees and snakes; the wealth of allegations; abused and abuser; the court cases; the fortune(s) earned and squandered; the list goes on and on.
as he listened to testimonials
Character – Waluigi Get a Gold Bays on every cup in Awakening Admirable Prix on 100cc
I guess loot is loot.
Over at Struggle Forever, my friend Jeremy has expressed worries about materialism, instead opting for the broader term “realism”. When I remarked on how I believe my variant of materialism as well as the work of the new materialists can allay these concerns, he responded as follows:
There is no pillow as soft as a clear conscience. – John Wooden
Oh dear..... what a pity
..sigh..
she just coyly smiled.
Basically, Obama has refused to have the Greater Israel Lobby move the red lines to rendering Iran incapable of producing a nuclear weapon, rather than deciding to make one or actually making one. And this will be where the Greater Israel lobby shifts its support to the Christianist GOP, already committed to the Netanyahu-Lieberman position on Iran and the settlements, and now financed by Greater Israel fanatics, like Sheldon Adelson. (Here's a response to the Atlantic interview in an Adelson newspaper in Israel.) So no surprise to hear Liz Cheney was on a panel with this kind of reception:
BOYS’ SKI MASK: Warm little Indian wears his feathers knitted over pipe cleaners, his war paint of duplicate stitch. Knitted nosepiece sewn on. Knitting worsted. 4-8.
When that happens, Judge Keller and the CCA majority think it appropriate for appellate judges to hypothesize other theories of the crime besides the one presented to jurors and suggest they "could" have found this or that alternative convincing. They could have, one supposes, but the case presented to the jury is the basis for appeals, not imaginary alternatives.
I even remembered to dig up a chewy he'd buried just the day before. Wally and I watched him bury it behind the tree. We were laughing because for once he didn't want his 11am chewy, and was saving it for later. We never knew it was because his kidneys were failing.
“I face the world as it is, and cannot stand idle in the face of threats to the American people. For make no mistake: Evil does exist in the world. A nonviolent movement could not have halted Hitler’s armies. Negotiations cannot convince Al Qaeda’s leaders to lay down their arms. To say that force is sometimes necessary is not a call to cynicism — it is a recognition of history, the imperfections of man, and the limits of reason.”
I DID IT.
one stretch
I mentioned that I started a new piece on Mother's Day but I only got several stitches in before I set it down so it's not worth showing yet. What is wrong with me lately. Two months of kaos around here has taken it's toll on my stitching mojo and blogging! It's not over, by any means but I am hoping it has settled down enough that maybe I can start to pull the unraveled strings of my life back into place (a little at a time).
Gaumukh – The walk of a lifetime to my Mother Ganga, what is left of her piety …
What was this rippling of the land?
Here he is, loving every moment (whilst watching the football). Thanks Sam!
As a single mother she raised two children, while making a meager wage at various jobs. My mother is not a quitter. She never had much as far as a home, cars, furnishings, clothing, travel, she had enough to take care of our basic needs. I rarely heard her complain. If she did, it was very short lived and to the point. She was done and moved on to brighter thoughts. She is not one to revel in judgment of others. She does not enjoy sitting around thinking negatively of life's circumstances. She is charitable and kind of all people. She is not complicated, she is simple in her wants and pure in her thoughts. She enjoys the simple things; sunshine, children, flowers, laughter, burbling of fish in the tank, jabbering of little colorful finches, rocks, the beauty of nature, the company of joyful people. She enjoys all people no matter who, what or where they came from as long as they are not too sour.
Ale: We made ten gallons of a light beer and are pitching each one with a different yeast and different fermenting temps, ale and lager. both will be dry hopped with fresh Cascade hops.
Let's make 2011 a green year.
Khan admitted common assault and also racially-aggravated assault, after the court was told he hurled racist abuse at one of the pedestrians.
My entry for that week revolved around a character called Tony, who I had recently created for a different writing exercise, but who I had found to be dull and I didn't expect to work with him again. But I gave him another shot with the W.o.W. exercise, and here is my post from Week 9, in which I introduce Tony.
Non-Jewish Children Sub-Human, Yebamoth 98a. All Gentile children are animals.
instead of upside down as charted. Let's see how
We are staying at Artillery Ridge Campground and RV which is also the home of the National Stables. They offer battlefield tours on horseback. Jerry thought that would be a good idea, I did not. It has been far too many years since I have been on a horse and I am no longer featuring an Annie Oakley venture. This RV park has a mixture of sites ranging from tents, to fifth wheels, to cabins to big rigs. On a short walk around the park I spotted the colony of tenters and there asleep in the front seat of one car that belonged to them was a young woman who apparently opted for the front seat of the vehicle in lieu of the ground. And of course they have stables for horses and room for horse trailers for those who tow their own. As soon as we arrived I could smell the horses; a horseman statue on top the roof welcomes arrivals.
"This is the cleanest oven I've ever seen," Dawes says.
474
And now? Now I feel like a bit of a fraud writing the blog. I'm writing it as a writer, but at the moment I feel anything but. I have an idea for a new novel. I have a plot. I even have a sub-plot. I have characters. I have settings. I have character sketches. I have character interviews. I have a synopsis (of sorts). I have a chapter plan (ditto). But I have hardly any words. I turn the computer on, I open Scrivener, and I look at the screen. It's not blank. There are 72 words on the page. But that's it. I like this story. I like the protagonist. Yet I just can't get going. Surely writers write. So why can't I do it? Is it because I don't yet have Beckett's (aka Ben Barnes) voice? In my heart I know that by writing the damned thing, his voice will come. Did I spend too long on the ditched story, so that I can't wipe the characters from my subconscious? Was the
If you’re not familiar with Thomas’s work… er, why the hell not? Seriously, go on, search for ‘The Golden Age of Wireless’ and ‘The Flat Earth’ and give them both a spin. Or if those aren’t to your taste (you’d be mad, but OK), try ‘Aliens Ate My Buick’ or ‘Astronauts and Heretics’ instead. If none of this moves you in any way, you are dead on the inside.
Yay you completed the very FIRST layer!
Rolling Stones Time is on my side UK
It was Saturday night and mega busy. Fortunately we arrived just before they started counting people one out, one in, but we still had to perch on stools while we waited for a table to become free.
Wound in mind’s wandering
Through our chimney right next to our tree
This is separate from the ANC's secretive funding arm, Chancellor House, which does business with the government on the party's behalf. The issues are different, though I am sure that the business deals that emerge from each often overlap.
I have a desire to be a much better person. I have a desire to get my priorities back in order and to get out of the sludge I've found myself in for quite some time.
But seriously. You know from experience that being a freedomista often brings you grief. You get the sorrow of watching your country go to hell. The agony of knowing your children will have it worse than you do. You have to put up with the sneers or uncomprehending stares of people who don’t want to hear perfectly sensible ideas. You hear media morons who know nothing about economics dismiss real money as “weird.” You watch the Bill of Rights crumble to dust, day by day. You know that the policeman is not your friend. That public servants are cruel masters. You know somuch that it hurts.
I have been thinking about the years that passed, the people that I’ve met along the way and everything that happened within the 23 years that I lived in this world. Looking back, I see so many mistakes in my past. I’ve committed unpardonable sins (according to the law of Bible). But God has always been so good. He never failed and He continually guides my path.
So hey! How've you been?!? Are you having a nice summer? It's been a while since I posted, and I guess that means I've been having a pretty nice summer too. I've been spending lots of time at the river with the dogs, goofing off and splashing around, and I have several cool embroidery and crafty projects in the works that I'll be able to share soon. I feel like I have so much to tell you guys! I guess I better blog more often so I don't overload you :o)
Anyhow . . . . . .
Larry Magid is an educator, journalist, and public policy analyst in the area of digital technologies and the internet. He is a regular contributor to CBS News, CNet, Forbes, and Huffington Post.
This is our first trip to Disneyland as a family. Our poor abused children ages 14, 13, 8, and 5 have never been. Travis and I haven't been since we were in high school. It has been a trip we (should I say the kids and I) have wanted for YEARS! We feel blessed to be able to go. It was never something we wanted to put off but payments for other things always came up. This year it was paint the outside of the house or go to Disneyland. We went to Disneyland. YAY!
day six, a tuesday...
For the record I live on an island where cannabis is still very illegal and still very much misunderstood. The myths surrounding the plant are still alive and kicking. Most people I meet and have met from overseas usually assume that where I’m from, ganja is legal and they are always surprised when I tell them, “unfortunately not.”
Christian Troy: None of us get out alive. Now you can huddle in a group and face it one day at a time, or you could be grateful that when your body rubs against someone else’s, it explodes with enough pleasure that you can forget, even for a minute, that you’re only a walking pile of ashes.
Saint Brendan is said to have discovered America 1,000 years before Columbus.
In this age of individualism and seclusion, we are trying to create a sense of belonging, having a community, a village. Working together is a great way of doing that. Conversation flows easily while hands are busy, and taking care of two babies is easier than taking care of one!
6) gasp – (Spanish verb boquear)
Joe and Katie were not meant to be which was alright with how Craig wrote it. I liked how each were now going after someone else but it is not an easy task.
Well the title is not because I nervous but rather the exact opposite. A dear friend of mine recently celebrated here one year anniversary of breast cancer and I wanted to make something for her as she is one of my biggest fans when it comes to my cards--think I make all of her cards now.
She continued to let the love of Jesus shine through her, and all who got to know her dearly loved her. The Care Center is having a special memorial service for her next week.
Last week was a good writing week. I met (well, almost met) my self-imposed quota of pages for what I am calling a "final first draft" of a story I wrote a couple of years ago. There have been a few changes: it is no longer set in a large, modern North American city, it's now set in Eighteenth Century London; and it is no longer for Young Adult readers, but for middle-grade readers. I'm starting to understand what one so often hears, about a story writing itself.
- Karl jenkins / electric piano, oboe, piano, baritone saxophone
It appears that they have a church over on the Caribbean side of the country where the donations pile in and the chance to expand on this side must have seemed heaven sent.
Close up of the Austrian defenders, lead by none than General Andreas Petrosic (yours truly). Although the General is depicted upon the ramparts, he evidently spent most of the siege in his favorite tavern, the Prancing Pony. Perhaps that explains the relatively passive conduct of the defense by the Austrians?
Job Search is going well, Lots of interviews, I'll let you all know soon.
Heating directions:
1 - Don't Look Back In Anger
To have best trekking experience, you need to hire a good tour and travel operator. A proficient operator will ensure a good time in Ladakh. They will provide end-to-end guidance along with perhaps amenities you will require during ladakh trekking. To get more out of the Ladakh experience, you need to prepare bit for the tour. Prepare your bag with right kind of clothes and things such as sunscreen lotion. Having ample knowledge of Ladakh tour itinerary will help you enjoy a lot more.
I tried hanging myself the other day as Party Time's gone and done a bunk and I was left to go round to the shop to buy heating credits, something I just couldn't be bothered doing – and so I thought to myself, 'instead of having to go outside into the cold night to buy heating and thus being left to freeze to death here at home I may as well just get it over with and kill myself by hanging.' But, would you credit it? The fucking rope I got outta the cupboard under the sink were too long and when I threw myself off the upstairs landing I landed smack on my ankle right in the front hall, the rope still well slack. And now that fuckin ankle's massively swollen up and aches dully and continually.
I love my boyfriend.
Instead of compensating Maudany for his unnecessary time in jail, he was again arrested with fabricated false charges. Journalist K.K. Shahina, who exposed this fabrication is also facing fabricated charges. Maudany today is in Bangalore jail without proper health care. His eye-sight is affected badly due to diabetes.
1. What are your weaknesses?
I open my eyes and look down upon my goddess card; The Queen of Pentacles reversed. A single line stands out, white on blue.
Well that’s it from me for this week…..short and sweet, although lots of photos.
Fair Haven, NJ native Dave Roberts is one of the brightest budding stars in the Garden State rap game. Roberts’ brand of Indie-Rhyming is one that resembles Kid Cudi, and his talent is helping him construct a savage reputation in the Jersey underground. Roberts’ nine-track mix tape is laid back, even soothing at some points, and works with themes the listener can relate to. Like Cudi, Robert’s doesn’t allow his flow to paint himself an artificial personality. He has problems just like the next guy and they come out his rhymes. It’s Roberts’ honest writing that makes him appealing and he’s hooked me.
Herons are often seen wading along shoreline of the ocean, ponds and lakes or in marshes; they stand motionless for long periods of time waiting for their prey to come in range and then strike very suddenly. They swallow their prey whole and can choke to death if the prey is too large.
Rev. David Brown, D.D., Professor of Theology, Aberdeen, Scotland.
On Facebook I wrote:
where do you find your color inspiration?
It was not a "prank" you fucktard! It was physical abuse, and it doesn't mean a damn thing if you did, or did not, think the boy was gay. You still abused and humiliated him!
Visit them and enjoy the smells, sounds, flavours and helpful people.
Watching Michelle Obama hula hooping plunged me back to my childhood. We had a hula hoop craze in the Congo too and I was pretty good at it: I was called a sissy for that, for hula hooping was considered a girl's "thing." But I’m sure that the new Congolese generation of both genders would certainly pick it up—if it weren’t for the prohibitive costs, though it’d be easy to make hula hoops with rattan or palm tree branches. I don't know why, but Michelle Obama's hula hoop swivels made me think she'd be good at Congolese dance, based roughly on the same principle...
Influence on audience
It was pretty cool. Drop dead gorgeous. But it was like $400 or thereabouts.
imagine
We went to Washington because I had some work to do in the National Archives with some other teachers. While we worked in the Archives, the kids explored the National Mall on their own (and at times with another parent). Here are some photos I found on their phones after coming home. It was fun to see the city through their eyes. Their photos really reflect their interests.
2) Must be a new project, made for this challenge
Me: No, Sweetie. Kieeeeerrrrrsten. And had Little Miss been born a boy, she was going to be James Spencer, and we were going to call her Jamie.
Two weeks later, the sisters went back to the flat when Ahmed ordered the woman to strip naked and was abusive when she refused, it is alleged.
What I will also say about 2012 is that like in 2007 the team will showcase and feature young talented arms. Back in 07 it was Joba Chamberlain , Phil Hughes and Ian Kennedy that showcased their talents for the Yankee Universe, now guys like RHP Dellin Batances,RHP D.J. Mitchell and C Austin Romine will showcase their talents and cor=tribute to not only;y this team but also for teams to come in the future.
“Pennies take up too much space on our dressers at home,” Finance Minister Jim Flaherty said in the text of his budget speech in Ottawa. “They take up far too much time for small businesses trying to grow and create jobs.”
On Wednesday morning I was at my desk doing some preparation for the Lancaster Beer Festival.
Mostly, this page is just very very ME.
High fives all around…
Joining SCBWI-BI means having instant access to a nationwide network of supportive writers, a constant rota of events and conferences, online and offline advice on everything (and if it's not there, just ask, you'll get plenty of answers!) and lots and lots of enthusiasm for the written word. I can't recommend it highly enough. Once you've joined, this competition could mean that your work gets into the hands of every UK children's book agent and editor, who pay a fair bit of attention to this little anthology.
Huh. Yeah. Ummmmmmm...
Much less than it used to, we’re 3 albums, and about 650 shows in. Someone posted a comment our recent video saying “like the white stripes in another dimension” then about ten other people gave the poor fucker loads of abuse for it.
thank you maria!
From here I get to see the visitors to our yard. Here a couple of rainbow lorikeets that dropped by for a feed as I was writing this. They brighten up even the dullest winter day, as do the eastern rosellas and king parrots.
Which Satan delivers a child a death curse
English historian Herbert Butterfield, known especially for opposing whig history, once warned historians about the dangers of making moral judgments in their analysis of the past. Historical events and human motivations are often morally complex and difficult for historians to judge. Moreover, the obvious battle lines that historians draw—between 16th-century Catholics and Protestants, for instance—may overshadow deeper or more nuanced aspects of moral conflict, such as “the war of good against evil … conducted within the intimate interior of personalities” (Butterfield, Christianity and History, 91). Eamon Duffy’s readable and provocative Fires of Faith: Catholic England Under Mary Tudor underscores the difficulty—and the controversial nature—of judging complex historical events and human motivations.
Roberto seems to be an artist who handles the business of art very well. He has collaborated with other artists and art forms. How many ways?
Thanks to insanely warm, unseasonable February weather, Chad-o and I were able to enjoy a hearty hike and fishing adventure over the weekend. After a little stop at the local diner and grabbing some hot java, we were off, slowly maneuvering the bumpy, twisty turns that lead to Laurel Hill.
Aren't they the cutest? I love that my friends now think of me when they see owls. :) I am not yet sure what I will do with them, but one thought is adding them to a plank of wood with some hooks below each- there are 4 members of our family and 4 owls, so it would be cute to have one represent each of us. The possibilities are endless, really!
Clockworks, which began last July and completes this (2012) June is the next story-arc in the series.
With the first contemporary evidence of his activities only to be found in June 1809, when he was already reputedly in his mid-40s, I then began to wonder about the veracity of the stories concerning the years prior to his establishment as a silhouette artist. To this end, I carried out a comparison of the accounts which have appeared. Most, if not all, of the material in reports about Foster's early years written in the 20th century has most likely been taken from a chapter in Robinson's 1866 book Derbyshire Gatherings (PDF), with the usual slight embellishments that are expected with time. Although his sources are not stated, Robinson, in turn, appears to have based his account mostly on the text of a speech by Henry Adams at the "conratulatory dinner" to Foster in November 1862, probably supplemented by newspaper and other reports of the period.
On another occasion, an eminent local environmental activist was delivering a lecture on wildlife and conservation in India, to a group of students. She mentioned that there had been some extent of success with the conservation of tigers in Bandipur National Park, as the population had climbed from 50 to 80 in a short span of five years. This, she said, was not enough to sit back and rest, and that every effort must be made to ‘further restore’ the tiger population at Bandipur.
The key authors of that document, American neo-cons Richard Perle, David Wurmser and Douglas Feith (who Gen. Tommy Franks called the ‘f… stupidest guy on the face of the earth” i.e. Bob Woodward’s Plan of Attack, pg 281), soon found themselves influential national security positions within a receptive Bush Administration from which to proselytize their recommendations.
That EXP is so large that it got me from level 70 with 0.00% to 81 and 20.00%! Yay!
Happy, happy, happy Birthday Josh and Jules! You are my sunshine on the cloudiest of days. Your personalities make my life brighter. I adore both of you so much, and thank God every single day that I finally got my miracles I hoped and prayed for. I am so very, very proud to be your Mommy, and I love watching you grow and leave babyhood behind and turn into this amazing, wonderful, beautiful, funny, smart little boy and girl. I hope you have had a wonderful weekend of family and friends, and have had a wonderful birthday. I know I will remember it forever. I love you both so very much!!
Head Smash
Does that include panties, because she sure needs a couple of pairs of those.And pray tell, what will her “fragrance” smell like?
Featured Designer - Alex Noble
So I’m on the witness stand and the nasty little defense attorney, having utterly failed to shake my testimony (“Mr. Sheeran said, ‘Now you can say you’ve had your first shakedown.’ I remember it clearly”) decides to attack me based on my psychiatric history, which was a big mistake. “I had depression, which is a treatable illness, and I sought and received appropriate treatment.” We went around and around on this. Later, the second-chair prosecutor told me that he was kicking the first-chair under the table and whispering, “Object! Object!” But the lead attorney’s position was that I was handling it just fine and I didn’t need him to interrupt. I finally turned to the judge and said, “Already asked and answered, your Honor,” and the judge ordered the defense attorney to move on but he had nothing to move on to. Back in the prosecutor’s office, they were gleefully declaring that “It was just like Perry Mason!”
and i dreamed a mean woman was making fun of my pink underwear.
No pics yet. When I'd finished I found out I have none of the parts that go on the stock. So, no recoil pad w/ screw and nut, barrel band spring, butt pad and screw. Also, the barrel band screw is stripped out, so I had to find replacement front sight keys and pins so I can replace the barrel band with a new one. I think the new barrel band will be the kind with the bayonet lug (type 3).
So she decides to try out the formula by applying it to organize her life and the business. As she starts to see this in action, she wonders what other things around her had she not noticed before that might also be trying to say something to humankind?
Worked on my Soulistry Animal Totem: Rabbit spread so I made a small version in my BOD.
Therefore polygamy in Islam is permitted based on this surah — only as the last resort,in a situation of great social hardship and on humanitarian ground.It is very important to note that in Qur’anic context polygamy was allowed for the benefit of orphans and the women who were their guardians or caretakers.
Last night, I had enough time to rack my British Pale that I dry-hopped with Summit into another carboy. I stole a taste of this one. I'm hoping for that taste of tangerine or orange that the Summits are supposed to have. It was dry-hopped with ony 1/2 ounce. The flavor reminds me more of Cascades right now. Perhaps it is just that I can make out the citrus flavors but not distinguish them as yet. I may have to wait until it's cold and carbonated before the flavor really comes out.
You can do the same thing for your closest friends without writing a letter. Say something next time you see each other. Pick up the phone and make a quick call. Send a text or post it on Facebook. Take that small step and remind them (or tell them one more time) all the awesome things you appreciate about them
Gladys: You still haven’t told me what to wear to the hip disco.
Vivid vision is an essential part of writing, and creative thinking.
-Chelsea Rose
So instead of a hat he got a lasso!
Cocteau, however, was far from satisfied by this denouement. “But this cannot close the case, Captain George!” he spluttered indignantly. “Where is the evidence for the statement of Mr Bananas? Even if we believe him, he had no authority to give a pardon. And how do we know that Mr Bananas himself is not the guilty one?”
The Lion Sleeps Tonight
Copyright Date: 1996, August
My little garden has been going CRAZY lately. We've been going out for months, picking tomatoes and strawberries every 3-4 days...but just a few at a time. In my head I was adding up what I paid to plant the garden thinking, "wow. what a great deal. so far we are at about 5 bucks per strawberry."
Lady of the English is set mainly in England, Normandy and Anjou between 1125 and 1149, spanning the years in which Empress Matilda (daughter of King Henry I of England) was first heir and then contender for the throne of England. All the main characters are historical figures, including Empress Matilda, her father Henry I, her second husband Geoffrey of Anjou, her eldest son Henry FitzEmpress (later King Henry II of England), her stepmother Adeliza of Louvain and her supporter Brian FitzCount.
Your invited to celebrate! Little Crown Interiors and Newport Cottages would like you to join in a special celebration of the "Hope" Crib: Thursday, October 14, 2010 from 4pm - 7pm at the Newport Cottages Store in Fashion Island, Newport Beach, CA. See the beautiful crib in person, in a nursery setting created by Little Crown Interiors. Items throughout the design will be raffled off, with proceeds to benefit Breast Cancer Research of course.
That's it.......four ingredients. How easy is that?
These elements can harmoniously co-exist and work off each other,” says Adam Court of OKHA Interiors. By utilising a broad base of textures and finishes, the décor feels natural and subtly organic, comfort being of paramount importance at all times; the overall ambiance is one of calm and serenity.
It's time for a Guinness!
OU: Recently, someone asked for opinions on what would be the top 10 must-have Yes ROIO’s. On my list, this is definitely near the top. Good recording quality, a powerful performance, and Mother Nature’s fury all wrapped into 80 minutes.
It is lovely, truly, lovely.
just enough information for the reader so that they would want to go out and
I felt exhausted when I woke up. Not helped by my rather manic cat, Abigail, howling like a mad thing throughout the night. I moved house a few weeks ago and she is taking a while to settle.
A couple nights ago Jerry and I had gone into the front yard to start drawing some sidewalk art (because you're never too old for sidewalk chalk), when Patsy started barking. I looked across the street to where she was staring and saw a police officer, with her weapon drawn, heading up my neighbor's driveway. I rushed Jerry into the house, called my neighbor to be sure his daughter was inside, then looked out the window to see another cop with a long range weapon aimed up the driveway of the next building over. Then there were two others, also with guns drawn, inside my next door neighbors trash can enclosure. I took this picture of some of the cops across the street, but it's through the window so it's not very good.
27. You find a spiritual track that makes sense to you and “speaks to you” at the most profound levels. Suddenly you are gaining a perspective that you would never have considered before. You hunger to know more. You read, share with others, ask questions, and go inside to discover more about who you are and why you are here
Tomorrow is such an exciting opportunity because character is a choice. When asked about the meaning of life, Kurt Vonnegut said, "We're here to help each other through this thing, whatever it is." If we make the daily decision to help, even in the smallest of ways, we can make the biggest difference.
I had a lot of help writing this and it is truly a collective effort. Thank you to my siblings for the honor of delivering this today and the encouragement to do so.
It was amazing to experience such a different culture. Wish I could have stayed a little bit longer, but before I knew it I was back on the plane and another 24 journey had begun.
HOW in the world CAN I do such a long term thing in my life as losing so much weight and LITERALLY revamping my life? It's NOT easy, but in breaking it down to itty bitty baby steps and staying motivated, I am making more progress than I've ever dreamed. You see, morbid obesity is like a huge mill stone tied ever so tightly around my neck and for many with this like me, escape is nearly impossible~but REMEMBER I've said, nearly...NOT totally. It IS possible. It is...I have to believe this!
I got some sewing done yesterday, too. The white skirt got it's pockets sewn on, and the side seams done,
The more prominent you make your widget, the more advantageous to your site!
When Tom and Izzy discover that the baby’s mother is in fact alive on the mainland, and has been in an extreme state of grief ever since her husband and baby vanished across the ocean one night. This is where the story really comes into its own, and where Stedman’s talent as a storyteller comes to the forefront. As a reader you are torn between Izzy, the woman who has longed to be a mother for many years, and has constantly fought a losing battle against mother nature’s determination for it not to be, and then you have Hannah, the woman who has lost her husband and her child, and who the entire town thinks is crazy because she believes they will return to her. If you knew this woman’s child was alive, but was loved very much by another, what would you do? Stedman forces you as a reader to address some important questions about humanity, and makes you constantly switch between sides. One minute you’re rooting for Izzy, the next you’re rooting for Hannah. But how long can something like this stay secret? Especially when Tom’s conscience is weighing him down; forcing him to put the life of another woman before his wife and her needs.
I didn't want to crash and burn at the end so I decided to slow it down a little bit. I passed the water station and knew I was at the halfway point. Shortly after that we approached what passes for a substantial hill in our area. I groaned inwardly and felt my pace drop. I was glancing at my Garmin to check out my average pace. I was trying to remember what my overall pace was when I PRed last time and I *thought* it was 8:16. So as long as I could keep it under that I figured I'd be golden.
Timmy Murphy fulfilled a lifelong ambition at Aintree in 2008 when he partnered Comply Or Die to victory in the John Smith’s Grand National. Born on August
The million dollar question is when will we see it in production. It’s no secret that Toyota’s CEO, Akio Toyoda, known sports car addict and driving force behind bringing the extravagant LFA to market, is enthusiastic about a Supra successor. The project has not be officially approved but if Toyoda had his way and the economy continues to show signs of recovery, the new coupe could be on showroom floors by late 2015.
Tuesday smiles (from the UK),
WTF???!!!!
Radiohead--Street Spirit (Fade Out) (Acoustic)
“I don’t think you specified.”
As for solar power generation much research has been done over the decades and there are two types.
Outstanding Lead Actress in a Comedy Series
So they are cute...because he is such a cute baby...not because of her camera abilities...can you tell I am a little bitter?
in Brooklyn.
Rothschild was again the only person suspected of being the Fifth Man, who had knowledge about this breakthrough area and fitted the other criteria concerning the double agent.
You have the best laugh ever
Through a series of bullet-points, you have the reason for my return. Though I've been intending to write this new-first post for a while, I've been having trouble finding the perfect topic to start off with (procrastinating probably enters into the equation too). After resubscribing to my foodie RSS feeds and scouring the internet for the perfect story, it was a commercial that finally led me back here to blogspot.
Together for so long
And that’s the really cool thing about my young self I remembered today. I was thinking about my future children having my Star Wars collection.
This madness has now reached a climax as Swansea University is forced to display this poster in toilets as many of their foreign students apparently do not know how to use a western toilet!
11. No Use Cryin’ (R. Charles, arr. Christiansen, La Grand, Oberg) 4:58
She recalled her innovative “youth cafe” collaboration with IMPACT Silver Spring in the Briggs Chaney crime hotspot as an example of a better approach — and told of talking with one young African American woman from Sherwood who said her friends were so bored they were looking forward to a curfew — as an exciting way to get chased by police.
Overall, this was the most exciting day of our lives, drama and all. It's gonna be all right. It has to. Thanks again for all of your thoughts and prayers! Please remember if you know me in real life that we're still keeping this "hush hush" until we make it through the first trimester. Thanks so much!
Or would you walk away
Some whiskey aficionados look on the entire class as not just suspect, but an insult to whiskey. Some won’t even deign to call it whiskey at all (and, under US law, grain spirits untouched by barrels are not whiskey, but that’s just using the law to enforce one’s prejudices). White dog, they’ll tell you, is useful only as a teaching tool. It is a proto-whiskey, a foil that elucidates the power of barrels and age. Those who would drink it as their drink of choice are defined by what they’re not: they are uncouth, uneducated, unsophisticated, and practically uncivilized. That some would actually want to drink the stuff is indicative only of their woeful state.
200g self-raising flour
How ’bout them Dawgs!
The person who solves the issue of poverty in India is not going to be a key tapping journalist, a politician, an NGO, an economics nobel laurete or a charitable organisation. They don’t understand the pain, and therefore they won’t understand the problem. They keep trying to transform or “raise” others into replicas of themselves. Gandhiji was one who transformed himself from a rich bania, to a man with two sets of clothes, a cobbler, a toilet cleaner, a weaver, a farmer… to become one of the people that he wanted to catalyse into helping themselves. He is an exception. That is why his solutions appealed to the masses. He felt their life, pain, problems and strengths.
Ohh how we laughed and laughed! I loved it! Don't you? For days afterward, out of nowhere, the phrase, Suburban Hade and Hutter Hop, would pop into my head and I'd laugh all over again. (In fact, it still makes me giggle!) Of course, after an explanation to the customer, the check was re-done, but Bob and Jeanette kept the first check, framed it, and the last I heard it was still hanging on the wall in their shop!
Kristi Parker Van Doren
Instead of all that waffle, I could probably have just typed a few words today - I feel unsettled!!! LOL!
The feedback I hear from clients and others who embark on a sacred tattoo journey are truly inspiring and beautiful. For those who have chosen this as their path and empowering tool of choice, they have been awed by the powerful ways their lives and those around them are affected simply by being more conscious with their choices and decisions in what they decide to create with their body art, realizing the skin can be a portal opening with many benefits. What is placed on the skin, then penetrates through to the DNA and energetic levels.
Times are tough. Actually, they're getting tough in a lot of places. They proved very tough for Hamas operatives in the Eastern Mediterranean last weekend. They were tough in poor Balto as well, with seven people shot to death. (Baltimore should be one of the jewels of the East Coast, but of course, it's no such thing. I wonder who's been running the place the last century.) It was nearly as tough in Chicago, with twelve shot and three dead. But when has there ever been good news from the Windy City?
“Looks a little bit like… Old Rabbit, doesn’t it, Tom?”
President Lyndon Johnson signed Medicare signed (sic) into law in 1965—providing millions of elderly healthcare stability. President Obama’s historic health care reform law, the Affordable Care Act, strengthens Medicare, offers eligible seniors a range of preventive services with no cost-sharing, and provides discounts on drugs when in the coverage gap known as the “donut hole.”
I’ll be posting more ways to earn income from home, so if you have a business that you would like featured please send me an email.
30. Steamboat Days (Steamboat-Loading Holler) - Richard Amerson
...Mr. Lewis, whose 1997 book, "Mining the Sky," helped popularize the idea of extracting natural resources from asteroids, said Planetary's president already owns a small firm that builds spacecraft.
Milton Keynes social services said the teenager had been ‘age assessed following established procedure and deemed to be 15 years of age and thus was accepted as a child in care’.
When all the grad school letters started pouring in like a flood of disappointment, I really thought my life was coming to a huge halt. I felt like I was riding on a river and coming up to the end. I vividly remember saying how I felt like my life was ending. “limbo” “stagnant” “no future” all became regular parts of my vocabulary. If I could get back to that being my only problem…
While the network is still far from completion, the cycling infrastructure is taking shape with separated bike paths beside the sidewalk as the infrastructure
GDA handled my rudeness really well... and when I apologized today he told me I was dumb for worrying about it so much. Don't you know how much I love you?
- me...I am Joy
Afterwards we hung out for a bit on the sidewalk and then eventually headed to Perry's. Thanks again to Jen, she secured us entry to where the elites and upper level volunteers were given the VIP treatment. Free food, free beer and a free rubdown = awesome. It took a lot of self-discipline not to go crazy on the breakfast menu however. It was delicious and there was plenty of it but I kept it under control. I did avail myself of the free rubdown and got to catch up with other friends.
The road has become the N120 now and quite busy, so we turn onto the yellow roads on our map and head towards the coast. This is always a good idea here as the whole of the coastline is a National Park and is stunning. It is now 19′c and we know that cycle touring could not get much better than this, “It’s February Esther, February!”
How Is the iPad Considered As an E-Reader?
Timed two days before the Bersih rally, Marzuke explains that it is an “advisory message” to “remind and reinvigorate the students about their responsibilities”. However, there is no mention of their rights to freedom of expression, guaranteed by the Constitution of their host country, the United States.
I started personal training sessions again today...thats dedicated for a Sunday!! But need to get my but into shape before I head to Bali in April!!
The story was all down on paper and embedded in my mind, and after writing it almost all the way through one time and being unsuccessful, I knew what I didn't want to happen.
Ask him if he really believes that all sperm are sacred, and, if so, why is he not out protesting male masturbation, and campaigning Congress to get laws passed against it?
15) NIGHTMARE – The Abstracts
● £120,000 from Dr Bryan Walton between 1999 and 2006.
These days, I’m trying to fill the emptiness with other things: love, patience, acceptance. Jesus.
I love you all dearly, but homegirl needed some down time.
10. My Online Astronomy Journal - My Online Astronomy Journal is a community based website for amateur astronomers who want to record their observations and share them with other people. Membership is free and open to everyone.
simplethings sandwich and pie shop (4 / 5)
For those of you who don’t know it, or aren’t lucky enough to live as I do, in the Vale which bears its name, the Uffington White Horse is a prehistoric chalk figure, cut into the turf to expose the white chalk beneath, close to the Iron Age hillfort known as Uffington Castle which rings the crest of the hill above it – but a bit older, late Bronze Age - around 3000 years old. Nobody knows anymore what it was for or what it signifies, but the impressive fact is that it has been maintained by local people - continuously - for the last three millennia, by a process of ‘scouring’ it every few years: this involves weeding it, and pounding lumps of broken chalk into the outline to rewhiten it. Otherwise, the turf would’ve reclaimed it within a few decades. In historical times, a huge country fair used to be associated with this. Nowadays, the National Trust turns up every so often with piles of chalk and baskets of hammers, and asks for volunteers. I’ve had a go myself – there’s a bit of the upper foreleg which is forever mine – and the thumping of about fifteen or twenty hammers pulverising the chalk up and down the length of the figure as it curls over the shoulder of the hill (it’s far too big to see all of it at once when you’re up close) sounds weirdly like galloping hooves…
This one is my adaptation of the cute reindeer cake pops you might have seen on the web. My version is not as good but was easier. I stuck two marshmallows on cake pop sticks and then dipped them in chocolate. I stuck googly eyes, a red rhinestone nose and the pipe cleaner antlers.
It was early Sunday morning, I was coming from a popular spot and what I thought was one guy lurking around turned out to be several and they rushed me. Like I have dozens of times I walked past some guys eyes straight ahead and this time these random people decide to grab me. There was nothing I could do at this point but accept my powerlessness. My injuries were not major but they were enough. My belongings were stolen and so was the sense I foolishly allowed, that my neighborhood had improved.
32. Inspiration flows easily to me.
Subhash Kak Phd., author the Gods Within, the Prajna Sutras, and the Architecture of Knowledge
“Gen-M, ‘Generation Monsanto,’ the first generation of humans force-fed genetically modified foods, hasn’t reached reproductive age yet (they were born in the late 1990s),” says a newOrganic Consumers Association(OCA) Action Alert. “But, if a critical mass of animal feeding studies are any indication, the millennial generation, reared on Food Inc.’s unlabeled ‘Frankenfoods’ can look forward to a long-term epidemic of cancer, food allergies, sterility, learning disabilities, and birth defects.”
To explore your fit with this industry and how to jump in, meet with a Career Link employment counsellor. It’s easy to book an appointment online or call us at 604.485.7958
These concessions are worth millions of ringgit, because of the quality and value of Belian wood, which can sell up to RM40,000 per tree.
Maybe five years ago, I was about to start writing The Highwayman's Footsteps. I wanted it to be "rip-roaring adventure", thrilling historical drama, just like one of my favourite books as a teenager, The Black Tulip by Alexandre Dumas. I remembered that The Black Tulip had lots of gore and high tension and a very fast-paced story.
Sullivan awesomely spent almost an hour on the phone answering these questions on a Wednesday and Friday morning. There were tributaries that’ve been compressed or cut for clarity, but this is fairly accurate.
Infertility is a bitch for doing this to us. For making us focus on the unhappy endings. For making us have to repeat the mantra “Today, I am pregnant” to keep from going crazy once we finally achieve pregnancy. For not letting us feel happiness without also feeling fear and anxiety. For making us go through wait after wait after wait – countless times before we get pregnant and again when we finally are pregnant.
This Happy Camper line is great by itself, but add in in the coordinating collection Fish Stories for even more fun. Three more patterned papers, plus a fishy themed sticker and fishy themed die-cut with fabulous title options and adorable artwork round out this collection. The masculine patterns and color palette make this a great line for creating a keepsake for Dad this Father's Day, or for highlighting the pictures of a great catch! Mix and match the patterns and solids, and stickers and diecuts from both collections for more options.
Both parties who sign a contract should be fully aware that a signed contract is a legally binding document. Both parties must fulfil their agreed assignments outlined to the best of their abilities and most importantly be aware what is, and, what is not expected. Any shortfall should be either re-negotiated or the lesser party be recompensed.
Execution teams also have spent substantial time during training sessions planning barbecues, picnics and other events, the filing says.
:: On a White Result: No further action is possible, and your sequence ends.
I spent more time than I ever expected in the expo area at BlogHer. It was very social and I ran into so many friends that it took me a while to work my way around the room. Speaking of which, special shout-out to The Mother Company for hosting an informal gathering of my Yahoo Motherboard friends and I and for not kicking me out when I spilled a grande latte all over their floor. Their products skew a bit young for my guys, but I'm going to watch the award-winning DVD they gave me and then find a good home for it.
If your money seems to disappear before you know it, this article is for you.
In the week after Jayalalithaa’s declaration of support to the plant, police cordons blocked the access of essential supplies and services for protestors in Idinthakarai. Keys to the Panchayat water tank were seized. Fortunately, the protestors had a fair share of fisherfolk among them. At tremendous expense of time and diesel, the protestors managed to bring in drinking water, provisions and milk for their children using their fishing boats through the sea route. “The government also suspended bus services in the area, causing untold hardships to the aged, ailing, and pregnant women needing urgent medical attention,” Rajappa’s fact-finding visit concluded.
I don’t care about the topic. I care about the editing. I care about the constant refinement and compression. I care about taking three pages and turning it one page. Then from one page into three paragraphs. Then from three paragraphs into one paragraph. And finally, from one paragraph into one perfectly distilled sentence.
Elout Smit: Drums, Percussion
a night without a moon,
— Andrea J. Buchanan, in Mother Shock3
Buxton's excellent Moor Top has a fair amount of cloudiness to it - I poured it pretty steadily and it has a beautiful golden haze, this is due to a touch of hop haze as well as a touch of loose sediment. The beer itself is delicious; light on the palate, brisk but firm bitterness balanced by fruit and a full, long finish. It has a haze regardless of how you pour it so don't
And he hung it on the bathroom door
I have two types of Excel worksheets for my budgeting: one breaks down the budget by my weekly paycheck a month at a time, and the other is for the year, a tab for each month. Naturally, I spent some time this month looking at 2011 as a whole.
But also,
3:17 - Clean rest of kitchen, do dishes, empty, refill and start dishwasher (that starting part, I'm particularly proud of because I usually forget it), plan for supper, set table, take out garbage
We bring the greater days.
That is walking in royalty. That is living a supernatural life. That should be how we all live.
Date: December 13, 2010
As evidenced by the ubiquitous promotional signs that have popped up on roads around the country, the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 allocated federal money to countless construction projects of varying importance. All too often, these signs accompany small-scale road construction projects everyone in the area knows is a waste of time and resources; easy short-term fixes for tough long-term structural problems meant to create the appearance of job growth and economic activity in a time of politically-damaging stagnation and decline.
Welcome to the Greatest Days of Fall and being a Giants fan. I relish days, games, opponents and opportunities like today. This is where you want to be as a fan at this point in the season..; That is, feeling good about your team and great about your chances as you face-off against your toughest competition and one of your most hated rivals.
2 showed
A few of my favorite stops that are close for me is the lower McKenzie River at Armitage park. Many native cutthroat and rainbow trout there. Another spot is the lower Willamette River known as the ‘Town Run’. This water has mainly been fished for Salmon and Steelhead, but a secret few know there are trout holding among them.
The Totally Tilda Team
I would caution anyone from Hasbro who chances by the blog, take the poor economy into account when you look at sales. Right now a good chunk of the buying demographic is has below average disposable income and a lot of competitors for what dollars they do have.
Here is our table set up for hubby and I to have our meal:
A Gallup poll, released last week, but conducted before the furor over the NGO prosecutions, found that a large majority of Egyptians – 71 percent – are opposed to U.S. aid.
and thoughts of broken people
#14) Billiards tables
You try to avert your eyes,
Daphne is a half-demon, half-angel daughter of Lucifer and Lilith. She lives in a strange sort of purgatory known as Pandemonium with her sisters, half-brother and other strange creatures from hell. Her life is far from exciting, before her brother Obie is kidnapped and Daphne travels to earth to find him -and instead finds a human boy who teaches her what it means to love and to be human.
Before I actually make my first major couponing trip to the store, I feel like there's a lot of planning that must take place ahead of time. I decided to start this series to share my adventures in couponing with you and to share what I do in this process. So with that said, I present to you...
But be sure to come back on Friday for our blog hop winners announcement!
-A large egg
Girl and Boy still love each other. They get married.”
So hurry up and pick your day because they'll go quick. We'll reserve December 21, 2012 for the Mayans, and January 31, 2013 for the dude who made the calendar hanging on my wall.
Trusting God the Almighty through the way of Jesus seemed insufficient for these teachers who were adding to the Gospel. Jesus from the beginning of his ministry to his death demonstrated by his LIFE the way of life that is pleasing to God. We see this in the way he preached, prayed and the interactions he had with his neighbors. He interacted with people, he empathized and sympathized and was touched and touched people’s life. He is therefore an example of how one should Love God and Love his neighbor. He fully trusted in his God and loved him with all his heart and soul. He never worried about what he would eat, where he would live or desired to be rich. Under the old covenant the animal sacrifices that people offered as examples of how one should live their lives. For instance a Lamb or Bull “without blemish or defect” symbolized a life of total dedication to God. Jesus demonstrated this in his life.
There is a cold steady rain. Dense and direct.
Pro Longwear Foundation - NW25
Internationally syndicated award-winning cartoonist, author, and stand-up comic. Author of Bizarro. vegan
L - Lemon. I'm not really a fan of lemonade, but I love me a good caipirinha (Brazilian drink, which is made from lemons)
I'm telling you about this, as its an example of how you should leave a piece of work to marinade for anything from a few weeks to several years, and then go back to view it afresh. The story I entered for the above competition was originally 2,700 words in length, written in the third-person past tense, with an ending that didn't seem quite right and yet had no obvious alternative.
So it’s that dreaded time of year again for college students….. Finals. As I sit here typing this I look around and see the stressed out faces of my peers wondering how they will make it through this next week, but heads up my friends we have made it through before and we will make it through once again! I promise! But just in case for some reason something happens to go wrong, I’m writing this post to tell you there is still hope in life. Today hope comes from Slutty Brownies, let’s face it the name is already enough that you’re pretty intrigued, but the name isn’t even the best part. The best part is why they have their name… they’re SUPER EASY to make. In fact as far as delicious desserts go, I think it is safe to say that this is one of the easiest ones out there. My cousin discovered this recipe a few months ago and we had to make it ASAP…. and then proceeded to make it every week after that because that is how delicious it really was. Take a break, mix some ingredients together and trust me, you’ll feel better about everything after this one!
I will name it, Some Bunny LOVES You. What do you guys think? The little girl and the bunny's are paper pieced.
– Ok – said the girl.
graphic novel (already proclaimed the biggest colour graphic novel ever, a mix of LOTR and STAR WARS) to be published in October, takes place in the year 2717, where humans have colonized the whole galaxy and a giant conglomerate mines alien planets for natural resources. The plot
There was a time - and it doesn't seem that long ago - when I would be one hundred times more likely to see sunrise over the Seine at the end of a big night painting the town rouge. This morning, I experienced dawn's crack on the arm of my 18-month-old son, as we scarpered from the apartment to give his long suffering mum a precious extra hour's sleep.
Patients who are most likely to contract glaucoma usually have family history of the disease, high eye pressure, a previous eye injury, chronic steroid use and/or diabetes mellitus.
312) hoping to grow in grace in Him
It is a comforting thought - that it is not man's activity that has caused global warming but a natural consequence of the sun's cycle. However, even this turns out to be true I don't think it is a reason to become any less careful with how we use and abuse our planet. Either way we are on the cusp of running out of oil. It seems a woeful shame to use this precious resource just for fuel. We have to find better sources of energy, because judging from the conclusion of the Sun Kings we may soon be needing more of it to keep ourselves warm.
you'l forget it the way you've forgotten
While reports on home prices have been mostly uninspiring, with some flickering of hope here and there, rent prices continue to make significant strides, with rent increasing more than 10 percent compared to a year ago in certain markets, according to findings Trulia released Thursday.
Instead I worked in the garden for some time and the new Daffodils, tulips and Hyacinths inspired me to create yet another floral card....lol. I enjoyed the beautiful weather to the fullest creating some cards,which are mostly not yet finished.
Let the convincing commence.
kirwanstudios@sbcglobal.net
Wake up. Morning devotions. Breakfast. Homeschool. Play. Lunch. Clean. Play. Snack. Dinner. Baths. Teeth. Bible. Bed.
I have an announcement to make. It's big... it's exciting.......................... I'm pregnant!!
The music. Oh, the music. Believe me, I get that he wasn't going for 'rocker' on this album, instead he's trying hard to tip his hat to the era of big band and go all old school on us. Problem is, he can't carry it. It doesn't work. I appreciate that style more than anyone and have extremely varied taste in music (just ask The Kid, cause he's been listening to me sing along to Streisand's Broadway album for two days… I like to pretend I'm Liza in the car.) So I'm not judging based on it straying from his normal output of sound. I'm judging the level of assault on my ears.
Possessions: An Arrow that always strikes true.
That’s one of the main reasons why I did not take a single drop of home-brewed samsu (there were LOTS of opportunities for this, especially when I became a Pengawas in June 2006); or drugs or whatever substances. It wasn’t easy at times where I’d resent “missing out on a lot of fun”.
In my house, I have neutral colored rugs. Sandy brown, speckled beige, and I even chose a cream colored carpet for the dining room. The dining room!
Level 13: MP Cost: 14, Attacks up to 5 enemies, Damage: 124%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
Tomorrow: What is a "grain" anyway?
I also helped Isabel in making show-cards for an upcoming book signing for Robert Hardman’s new book, Our Queen. A show-card is a large poster board containing information on the author’s event and also adds colour to the display.
Friday to hit the road to Carlsbad Caverns in New Mexico. Roughly 140 miles from El Paso. We found that we had to drive through Guadelupe National Park to get there. We all were in aww of everhting we saw. A and E became Jr. Rangers and M became a Sr. Rangers. To become Jr. Rangers and a Sr. Ranger they had to track animals, get quizzed on the local animals and plants. Watch a video on how the Carlsbad Caverns and Guadelupe Mountains were formed then take a quiz. They had to learn desert survival. A~ really enjoyed that. He is all about that stuff. They all did very well. We are all doing the National Park Passort Progam. Every National Park they go to they will get a stamp for that park. They loved that idea.
After lunch we went home, changed into grubby clothes and finished putting up the stone on the lower walls of our sunroom. We even started putting the cement/grout between the stones that we put up last weekend. We spent about 4 hours in the baking sun working on it, when wouldn't you know it, we ran out of cement/grout!! I am soo disappointed (heavy sarcasm here) that we had to stop!
If you don't have lots of soul
When I was a small child, my mom would throw my brother and I in the tub at the same time for a bath. Saving time and energy, I'm sure. It was lots of fun because we had those sliding glass doors on our tub. We'd close the doors and have diving contests. I wonder if my mom realizes that we were just one super dive away from stitches? We enjoyed trying to see how "big a splash" we could make. Out of all of our tub toys, the Three Men in a Tub really stands out to me. A butcher, a baker and a candlestick maker. Few things seem more elusive to me. Why these professions and where exactly were these three men headed in that tub anyway? Needless to say they survived many a rogue wave in our tub.
Then you can do the work for me.
Self Portrait.. So lets talk about this photographic experience from a first hand point of view. A lot of people feel very uncomfortable having their picture taken. I am one of these people as I am critical of images of me. I did laugh though when I eagerly looked to see what the challenge was this week. I wonder if I had a crowd standing with me. I think I did!
For i know that tomorrow in some other place,
To become who I was meant to be, the ugly had to vacate the premises. The ugly wasn't my fault- but I had to forgive myself. The ugly wasn't the fault of the adults in my childhood- but I had to forgive them. The ugly was completely the fault of my abuser- and to conclude the ugly inside of me, I had to forgive him. It didn't happen overnight. It didn't happen in the 2 weeks that I was inpatient or in the months that I was outpatient in the hospital. It happened in little steps and stages over the course of several years.
Second Marriage: Armstrong ?
The son learns the father is a cheat, an adulterer, a coward, a liar. Or the son learns the father is a hero, a paragon, a faultless man of integrity. Or the son learns his father is exactly as he appears, and nothing more. The exact fact does not matter.
They have been educated to see themselves as equal to men but in practice women’s vital organs are not as strong as men’s and they have a greater chance of liver and kidney damage as well as permanent brain damage.
The Duchess knew how to wear a STRIPE. Her sense of style was impeccable-meaning perfect for Her. That slat thin figure wore slat-like Stripes with panache.
Let me turn to goodies. The couple of hundreds or dollars for the GST rebates, or medisave top up. For the medisave top up of $200 – 300, is not enough for my monthly medical expenses! The government plays good guy by giving this to the CPF, that to rebate. For me, I do not want any ‘give away or gifts’ which actually came from us in the first place. What I want is to have a first hand reduction of cost. I look at how you manage it, not how you ‘give’, rebate or return to me, what if I am dead now?
A very good morning Tuesday to you, Midnight Madness day in the challenge world! As always, Priscilla has given us a fun sketch challenge, CAS or Fancy, YOUR choice!! Have you decided which way you will be heading in your creation, I find myself on the Fancy side this week!
Just over the hill from Stubby's is what we call the Dead Swamp. None of my local friends have ever seen anything alive here.
In the midst of their confusion—their slowness of heart—Cleopas and his companion respond to a stranger with hospitality. The stranger who has listened to their story…the stranger who has told their faith story back to them in a way they had not heard or seen before—even from their own scripture and tradition. This stranger is the one whom they invite to stay with them.
Consider this against the backdrop of the change to the commissioning landscape. Processes and people delivering value on contracts through good commissioning practice are changing / leaving the service and you might wonder whether this is impinging on the commissioning and contracting function’s ability to do their job of keeping providers honest.
The fulfillment of retirement dreams
Anyway, I'm almost at the end of this glass now, so there's probably little or no point in trying to continue...
Sight words are a great way to give a child a "head start" in reading. These words occur often in beginner reader books. Knowing these words will eliminate the need to "sound out" every. single. word. Help your child identify (and eventually spell) the following words: a, at, am, and, can, I, like, me, my, no, said, see, the, to. Add to this list as your child masters the words.
Change is, of course, inevitable. Things come, they go, they change. Part of moving past middle age is thinking that everything is changing way, way too fast. Of course. But for us here in Midland, in the huge ongoing oil boom, we're getting to watch a speeded-up version, change on fast-forward. It feels like the beginning scenes in a movie where they show the highway in a city at dusk, in speeded-up fast forward, with the cars zipping by in a blur of lights and lights coming on and going off in buildings and construction going up in an instant. That's what it feels like here in the desert, where you can drive out west of town and see rows of MacMansions going up overnight--houses with turrets and five-car garages set amidst the dust and mesquite being leveled for a new subdivision--and then drive past parks where everything has dried up to a brown crust. Fascinating, surprising, scary, irritating, exciting, confusing, comical, endearing.
The variety in her interpretations of people perfectly combine the latest fashion and keep up with her personal point of view. Her perception together with her wonderful fantasy just keep on surprising and astonishing me every time she publishes a new outcome of her ultimate talent. Finely drawing every little detail, Zhenya balances a great mixture of colours and still leaves some parts black and white - something I absolutely adore. It somehow leaves me behind to "fulfill" the rest of it and gives the observer the chance to interpret her images with a personal thought.
The artist who drew this is Jimmy Cauty, and he was 17 when he painted this. Which blows my mind when I think about it. That's a lot of talent to have at that age.
her eyes slowly open, dark and light the opposites of her orbs that see into my soul,
I forgot to set -
I expressed my frustration to Ubes. "See, this store pisses me off every time I come in here. I always have a hard time finding someone willing to help me."
There’s plenty more games hitting in May which you’ll find below the break…
This is a “Snatch” Land Rover. These vehicles were deployed to Iraq and Afghanistan, but were subject to extensive criticism as they provided little protection to their users. Various press reports claim that over 37 British servicemen or women have been killed in Afghanistan whilst travelling in them. A number of legal claims have been made in respect of these deaths and others’ injuries, based upon the assertion that as these vehicles were known to provide little protection, particularly against improvised explosive devices or roadside bombs, the Ministry of Defence was negligent. One of the bases of some of the negligence claims concerning Snatch Land Rovers suggests that the Ministry of Defence was negligent in not procuring suitable alternative vehicles to the Snatch Land Rovers, once it was realised that these were extremely poor in theatre. However, these claims have to date been unsuccessful, based upon the defence of “combat immunity”.
It is no accident that is list is more World Cinema than Hollywood.
dhyAna (meditation/contemplation), AvAhana (invitation) Adi etc
“Birds would be highly sensitive to chilli,” my friend interrupted. “As would you, if it was rubbed on the sensitive parts of your body.”
We welcomed our new baby girl, "E," into the world on November 25, 2011!
The lodge is classic rustic. The benches are the kind we all had to make in shop class in junior high. There's no fireplace but attached to a wall is a truly ancient pair of skiis. (Think 1x4s with leather straps.) And this lodge smells like homemade soup. Plus the cinnamon buns here? Whoa.
The behemoth that is MasterChef Australia is back and you better be ready for it because it’s on six nights a week. The whole thing kicked off last night with a 90 minute first episode where we were introduced to 50 new contestants and got to watch as they floundered about trying to impress the judges. While host Sarah Wilson from last season has been given the boot, all three of the boys are back in town: Gary, George who is again. Treating. Every. Word. Like. A. Sentence! And of course Matt Preston who’s amazingly become more of a pompous oaf since last time we saw him.
Having little coordination, my early forays into dance were highly embarrassing. My friend Jen was aghast that I couldn’t master the Roger Rabbit. I was completely lost during the dance portion of auditions for My Fair Lady. I wore holes through the soles of my pantyhose in a vain attempt to learn the Charleston. My two left feet were so bad that I couldn’t even follow a step aerobics class; my friends literally fell off their benches laughing at me. I went off to college, being able to do nothing more than the standard teenage writhing to rock music.
Finding out how they discovered our wrappers.
Who would have thunk it?
Continuing the trend of checking official websites, it looks like Persona 4 Arena‘s Japanese site got an update too. Several in fact. Going there now, you’ll notice that the sites taking a little longer to load. That’s because the theme song gotten a change. Now someone is singing the theme song in glorious, glorious Engrish. Delving into the characters section, you’ll see three new combatants have been added. First is Elizabeth, Igor’s assistant from Persona 3. This might peak your interest if you’ve played to the end of Persona 3 and fought Margaret in Persona 4. Since Persona 4 Arena is canon and takes place after Persona 4, her inclusion might indicate something. She’ll be using Thanatos as her Persona.
God’s Spirit
In her voice over at the end of the episode she tells us that Devon doesn't deserve Nova (word) and that she doesn't want anything to do with him. She realizes it's never going to work out with him (gee, what was your first clue?). She's focused on her education and is grateful to her mom for everything she's done for her. She wants the best for her own daughter and knows more than a high school diploma is the only way she can really provide that best for Nova.
The girls wear nothing but a smile.
You knock on the door and the woman of the house comes out.
NON-DESTRUCTIVE SEA LEVEL CHANGES AND STRONG OR UNUSUAL CURRENTS
Torn Mozzarella 1/4 ball
3) psychopaths, being control-driven, want to WIN. To them, winning means catching their targets into their spider’s nets and destroying them
Kay expressed delight that she was able to meet my daughter who was "just a twinkle" when we last met. I bought a purse, gloves, and shirt for Rosie and a few dresses, skirts, a shirt, a suit, and shoes for me. With Kay's amazing discounts, the total was still under $100.
- Belgium: smoked salmon rillettes & herb garlic crostini with Fantôme Spéciale De Noel - 10% ABV
Manager John Bolton said: 'We do go by height at Jolly Roger - a bigger child would wear the equipment out quicker than a smaller child would.
Despite repeated requests for updated accountings and the thousands of dollars still owed in back royalties to NLA authors who used to be with Dorchester, we've received excuses, delays, and no good faith efforts to resolve their obligations.
Greg Joseph Buck, 37, New York, N.Y.
as if it were intentionally
chaudin was the best I ever remember eating. Those produced
This is not achieved by mimicking someone else or preaching something that is not in the text (i.e., prosperity preaching, etc.). It is achieved by preaching Jesus Christ and Him crucified. It is achieved by preaching the totality of the infallible Word of God with integrity. The level of warfare is too high and the times are too rough to take this lightly!
To finish, share the answers and revise the contents taught.
Born in Shizuoka Japan August 31, 1965, Bessho’s hobbies include singing, piano and studying English. In 1992 he won the Japanese Academy Award for best actor in the category of new comer. His stage appearances include the Japanese productions of Les Miserables (2003) and You’re In Town (2004).
‘In this case, these guidelines were applied and the CPS accepted that the householder had acted in self-defence, and that the correct course of action was to proceed with charges of aggravated burglary against the intruder and to take no further action against the householder.’
What's your guiltiest pleasure?
I live in an apartment building that is, frankly, something of an old age home — filled with people in their 70s, 80s and 90s. There are days I weary of gray hair and halting gaits, but I have also learned to appreciate the deep value of role models, especially of older women living, well, alone.
And so it is, Ascended Master, Saint Joseph through Julie Miller
So naughty right?! It's the window in their room. I'm sure it's going to cost over $200 to fix. We have the money to fix it, but it is lame that we have to fork out our money for something like this. Today we are going through all the toys. It's "clean out time" and I will have no mercy! I'm sick of asking them to pick up the same things again and again and hearing "I can't find it". If they have too much stuff... no prob... we'll just get rid of things. I'm taking motherhood by the bullhorns and showing them how our home will be!
You know why? because we can't go naked and I can't stop cooking and we have to be able to walk through our rooms without hurting ourselves....See I can't just let it be. It doesn't work that way.
Primera Division Campeonato de Apertura 2012, thirteenth round
Recept: Sorry, sir. It's CHANGE.
Skim milk is something I have been daring myself to switch to for a few years. The arguments have always been very convincing for the shift but I could never make myself do it.
The recent London demo of the "English" Defence League ( a better name might be the Jewish Defence League) in which British White youths wrapped themselves in the foreign flag of the bandit state of Israel whilst listening to an hysterical rabbinical speech, exposes the "English" Defence League for what it really is - a Zionist, possibly Mossad backed False Flag operation.
I was reading through Ephesians and these verses helped to draw all that together and bring it home.
It’s beautiful, isn’t it?
Sellin' Black puddens a penny a pair."
But I’m beginning to prattle on. Thank you Dora. And thank you for your blog. And thank you for tuning into my son and my struggle, and “getting” why it can be so hard. When I started this blog, I didn’t want it to be just about autism, though I find myself returning to that topic more than any other. I’ve come to believe that’s because Jonah fascinates and astounds (and stupefies and overwhelms) me on a daily basis.
The following day, we woke up going, “What the heck was that all about?” and we laughed off the stupid events of the previous night.
So just because I can here is a few "pear" thoughts from around the world
Denmark lovely Thyssen makes a sexy presence as the evil doc's wifey-poo and presents a believable erotic symbol of desire for the doc to ignore, shipwrecked-guy to lust after and our monster to scoop up and carry around for the poster artwork and so forth. Not that she serves much more of a purpose than that, but for starting out in her career as the un-credited "Cover Girl" from the Marilyn Monroe classic Bus Stop, that's not bad. Of course, when you consider that her career ended with her featuring in a couple of Three Stooges shorts (Joe Besser-era) and that 1967 classic Cottonpickin' Chickenpickers, this film was probably her career apex.
The waitress behind the counter walked over and took our orders. I made a quick decision for my order since I didn't have an opportunity to read the menu. The waitress retreated back to the kitchen to place our orders.
